Illinois, session 104th, HB3525.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Energy Transition Act is amended by 5changing Section 5-25 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 730/5-25)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on September 15, 2045)8    Sec. 5-25. Clean Jobs Curriculum. 9    (a) As used in this Section, "clean energy jobs", subject 10to administrative rules, means jobs in the solar energy, wind 11energy, energy efficiency, energy storage, solar thermal, 12green hydrogen, geothermal, electric vehicle industries, 13electrification industries, other renewable energy industries, 14industries achieving emission reductions, and other related 15sectors including related industries that manufacture, 16develop, build, maintain, or provide ancillary services to 17renewable energy resources or energy efficiency products or 18services, including the manufacture and installation of 19healthier building materials that contain fewer hazardous 20chemicals. "Clean energy jobs" includes administrative, sales, 21other support functions within these industries and other 22related sector industries. 23    (b) The Department shall convene a comprehensive   HB3525- 2 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1stakeholder process that includes representatives from the 2State Board of Education, the Illinois Community College 3Board, the Department of Labor, community-based organizations, 4workforce development providers, labor unions, building 5trades, educational institutions, residents of BIPOC and 6low-income communities, residents of environmental justice 7communities, clean energy businesses, nonprofit organizations, 8worker-owned cooperatives, other groups that provide clean 9energy jobs opportunities, groups that provide construction 10and building trades job opportunities, and other participants 11to identify the career pathways and training curriculum needed 12for participants to be skilled, work ready, and able to enter 13clean energy jobs. The curriculum shall:14        (1) identify the core training curricular competency 15    areas needed to prepare workers to enter clean energy and 16    related sector jobs;17        (2) identify a set of required core cross-training 18    competencies provided in each training area for clean 19    energy jobs with the goal of enabling any trainee to 20    receive a standard set of skills common to multiple 21    training areas that would provide a foundation for 22    pursuing a career composed of multiple clean energy job 23    types; 24        (3) include approaches to integrate broad occupational 25    training to provide career entry into the general 26    construction and building trades sector and any remedial   HB3525- 3 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    education and work readiness support necessary to achieve 2    educational and professional eligibility thresholds; and3        (4) identify on-the-job training formats, where 4    relevant, and identify suggested trainer certification 5    standards, where relevant.6    (c) The Department shall publish a report that includes 7the findings, recommendations, and core curriculum identified 8by the stakeholder group and shall post a copy of the report on 9its public website. The Department shall convene the process 10described to update and modify the recommended curriculum 11every 3 years to ensure the curriculum contents are current to 12the evolving clean energy industries, practices, and 13technologies.14    (d) Organizations that receive funding to provide training 15under the Clean Jobs Workforce Network Program, including, but 16not limited to, community-based and labor-based training 17providers, and educational institutions must use the core 18curriculum that is developed under this Section.19(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 20    Section 10. The Public Utilities Act is amended by 21changing Sections 1-102, 8-101, 9-229, 9-241, and 16-111.10 22and by adding Sections 1-103, 3-128, 8-104B, 9-228.5, 9-235, 239-254, and 9-255, and Articles XXIII, XXIV, and XXV as 24follows:   HB3525- 4 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    (220 ILCS 5/1-102)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 1-102)2    Sec. 1-102. Findings and Intent. The General Assembly 3finds that the health, welfare, and prosperity of all Illinois 4citizens require the provision of adequate, efficient, 5reliable, affordable, environmentally safe, and least-cost 6public utility services at prices which accurately reflect the 7long-term cost of such services and which are equitable to all 8citizens. It is therefore declared to be the policy of the 9State that public utilities shall continue to be regulated 10effectively and comprehensively. It is further declared that 11the goals and objectives of such regulation shall be to 12ensure: 13        (a) Efficiency: the provision of reliable and 14    affordable energy services that meet the State's climate 15    and emissions reduction targets at the lowest societal 16    least possible cost to the citizens of the State; in such 17    manner that: 18            (i) physical, human, and financial resources are 19        allocated efficiently and equitably; 20            (ii) all supply and demand options are considered 21        and evaluated using comparable terms and methods in 22        order to determine how utilities shall meet State 23        emissions reduction targets and their customers' 24        demands for public utility services at the lowest 25        societal least cost; 26            (iii) utilities are allowed a sufficient return on   HB3525- 5 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        investment so as to enable them to attract capital in 2        financial markets at competitive rates; 3            (iv) tariff rates for the sale of various public 4        utility services are authorized such that they 5        accurately reflect the cost of delivering those 6        services and allow utilities to recover the total 7        costs prudently and reasonably incurred; 8            (v) variation in costs by customer class and time 9        of use is taken into consideration in authorizing 10        rates for each class. 11        (b) Environmental Quality: the protection of the 12    environment, people, and communities from the adverse 13    external costs of public utility services, including 14    environmental costs, so that: 15            (i) environmental costs of proposed actions having 16        a significant impact on the environment and the 17        environmental impact of the alternatives are 18        identified, documented, monetized, included in 19        assessments of cost, and considered in all aspects of 20        the regulatory process; 21            (ii) the prudently and reasonably incurred costs 22        of environmental controls are recovered. 23        (c) Reliability: the ability of utilities to provide 24    consumers with public utility services under varying 25    demand conditions in such manner that suppliers of public 26    utility services are able to provide service at varying   HB3525- 6 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    levels of economic reliability giving appropriate 2    consideration to the costs likely to be incurred as a 3    result of service interruptions, and to the costs of 4    increasing or maintaining current levels of reliability 5    consistent with commitments to consumers. 6        (d) Equity: the fair treatment of consumers, including 7    equity investment eligible persons and equity investment 8    eligible communities, as defined in the Energy Transition 9    Act, and investors in order that 10            (i) the public health, safety, and welfare shall 11        be protected; 12            (ii) the application of rates is based on public 13        understandability and acceptance of the reasonableness 14        of the rate structure and level; 15            (iii) the cost of supplying public utility 16        services is allocated to those who cause the costs to 17        be incurred; 18            (iv) if factors other than cost of service are 19        considered in regulatory decisions, the rationale for 20        these actions is set forth; 21            (v) regulation allows for orderly transition 22        periods to accommodate changes in public utility 23        service markets; 24            (vi) regulation does not result in undue or 25        sustained adverse impact on utility earnings; 26            (vii) the impacts of regulatory actions on all   HB3525- 7 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        sectors of the State are carefully weighed; 2            (viii) the rates for utility services are 3        affordable and, therefore, ensure and preserve the 4        availability and accessibility of such services to all 5        customers, and customers are not energy burdened or 6        severely energy burdened citizens.7        As used in this subsection (d): 8            (I) "Energy burdened" means, with respect to a 9        customer's household, that the household pays 6% or 10        more of its income toward electricity and gas bills.11            (II) "Severely energy burdened" means, with 12        respect to a customer's household, that the household 13        pays 10% or more of its income toward electricity and 14        gas bills. 15        (e) Affordability: the ability of utilities to ensure 16    uninterrupted access to essential utility service; to 17    minimize and reduce over time the number of households who 18    are energy burdened and severely energy burdened, as 19    defined in this Act, ideally to zero; and to minimize 20    disconnections to residential customers in a manner which 21    ensures that:22            (i) all low-income customers, defined as those 23        whose income is less than or equal to 80% of the area 24        median income, as defined by the United States 25        Department of Housing and Urban Development, have 26        access to a discounted utility rate;  HB3525- 8 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1            (ii) low-income customers 65 years of age or older 2        are not disconnected from essential utility service 3        due to inability to afford the monthly bill;4            (iii) low-income customers with children under the 5        age of 6 are not disconnected from essential utility 6        service due to inability to afford the monthly bill;7            (iv) persons with medical conditions are not 8        disconnected from essential utility service if a 9        medical or qualified professional as described in 10        subsection (b) of Section 8-202.7 certifies that the 11        condition will be exacerbated by disconnection from 12        essential utility service;13            (v) disconnection of essential utility service is 14        not accelerated based on a utility's payment risk 15        assessment of a customer; and16            (vi) a utility assesses whether a customer may be 17        eligible for energy assistance programs under the 18        Energy Assistance Act, provides the customer with 19        specific information on where and how to obtain energy 20        assistance, and ceases disconnection activity for 60 21        days to allow the customer to apply for and establish 22        eligibility for the energy assistance. 23    It is further declared to be the policy of the State that 24this Act shall not apply in relation to motor carriers and rail 25carriers as defined in the Illinois Commercial Transportation 26Law, or to the Commission in the regulation of such carriers.  HB3525- 9 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit, restrict, 2or mitigate in any way the power and authority of the State's 3Attorneys or the Attorney General under the Consumer Fraud and 4Deceptive Business Practices Act.5(Source: P.A. 92-22, eff. 6-30-01.) 6    (220 ILCS 5/1-103 new)7    Sec. 1-103. Commission methodologies and metrics. The 8Commission shall oversee the objectives identified in Section 91-102 by establishing and implementing methodologies for 10tracking each of the following metrics:11        (1) Environmental costs: The Commission shall 12    establish a social cost of greenhouse gases, measured in 13    dollars per ton of carbon dioxide equivalent, that shall 14    serve as a monetary estimate of the value of not emitting a 15    ton of greenhouse gas emissions. The Commission shall 16    consider prior or existing estimates of the social cost of 17    carbon issued or adopted by the federal government, 18    appropriate international bodies, or other appropriate and 19    reputable scientific organizations. The social cost of 20    greenhouse gases shall: 21            (A) estimate the emissions for all relevant 22        greenhouse gases, including carbon, methane, nitrous 23        oxide, hydrofluorocarbons and hydrofluoroolefins, 24        perfluorocarbons, sulfur hexafluoride, and nitrogen 25        trifluoride;   HB3525- 10 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1            (B) consider the fullest geographic and temporal 2        scope of damages; 3            (C) for the purposes of this Act, the cost of 4        greenhouse gas emissions is no less than the cost per 5        metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions, 6        using the 2.5% discount rate, listed in Table ES-1 of 7        "Technical Support Document: Social Cost of Carbon, 8        Methane, and Nitrous Oxide Interim Estimates under 9        Executive Order 13990", a report prepared in support 10        of federal Executive Order 13990 and dated February 11        2021.12        The Commission must annually adjust the costs 13    established in this Section to reflect the effect of 14    inflation and may, at its discretion, set the price at a 15    higher level than described above, but no lower. 16        (2) Impacts to public health: The Commission shall 17    develop a methodology for measuring and monetizing in cost 18    assessments the public health impacts of pollutants, 19    including impacts of both indoor and outdoor air quality, 20    including carbon monoxide and carbon dioxide, nitrogen 21    oxides, including nitrogen dioxide, particulate matter, 22    formaldehyde, sulfur dioxide, ozone, and lead. The 23    Commission shall integrate its methodology into 24    assessments of utility system planning and supply and 25    demand-side resource selection. 26    It is further declared to be the policy of the State that   HB3525- 11 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1this Section does not apply to motor carriers and rail 2carriers as defined in the Illinois Commercial Transportation 3Law or to the Commission in the regulation of such carriers. 4    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit, 5restrict, or mitigate in any way the power and authority of the 6State's Attorneys or the Attorney General under the Consumer 7Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act.  8    (220 ILCS 5/3-128 new)9    Sec. 3-128. Fixed charge. "Fixed charge" means a charge 10that is assessed by a public utility as part of its rates, is 11equal across all customers or customers of a certain class, 12and is not directly proportional to a customer's usage. 13    (220 ILCS 5/8-101)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 8-101)14    Sec. 8-101. Duties of public utilities; nondiscrimination. 15A public utility shall furnish, provide, and maintain such 16service instrumentalities, equipment, and facilities as shall 17promote the safety, health, comfort, and convenience of its 18patrons, employees, and public and as shall be in all respects 19adequate, efficient, just, and reasonable.20    All rules and regulations made by a public utility 21affecting or pertaining to its charges or service to the 22public shall be just and reasonable.23    An electric A public utility shall, and a gas utility may, 24upon reasonable notice, furnish to all persons who may apply   HB3525- 12 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1therefor and be reasonably entitled thereto, suitable 2facilities and service, without discrimination and without 3delay. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a gas 4utility may cease providing service if the Commission 5determines that adequate substitute service is available at a 6reasonable cost to support the existing end uses of the 7affected utility customers. Any applicant for gas service 8shall receive clear, timely information from the gas utility, 9written in plain language, and approved by the Commission 10after stakeholder input on incentives and opportunities for 11installing, as alternatives to gas, energy-efficient electric 12technologies and incentives and opportunities for other energy 13efficiency measures, weatherization, demand management, and 14distributed energy resource programs. The information provided 15must include, among other things, information detailing 16electrification incentives in the Inflation Reduction Act and 17describing how the applicant can elect to receive the upfront 18discounts or tax incentives applicable to the applicant's 19electric purchases. 20    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prevent a 21public utility from accepting payment electronically or by the 22use of a customer-preferred financially accredited credit or 23debit methodology.24(Source: P.A. 92-22, eff. 6-30-01.) 25    (220 ILCS 5/8-104B new)  HB3525- 13 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    Sec. 8-104B. Gas energy efficiency.2    (a) As used in this Section:3    "Benefit-cost ratio" means the ratio of the net present 4value of the total benefits of the measures to the net present 5value of the total costs as calculated over the lifetime of the 6measures. 7    "Cost-effective measure" means a measure that satisfies 8the total resource cost test.9    "Energy efficiency measure" means a measure that reduces 10(i) the total Btus of electricity and natural gas and other 11utility-delivered gaseous fuels needed to meet an end use or 12end uses and (ii) the amount of natural gas and other 13utility-delivered gaseous fuels consumed on site, at the home 14or business facility, to meet an end use or end uses.15    "Total resource cost test" means a standard that is met 16if, for an investment in an energy efficiency measure, the 17benefit-cost ratio is greater than one. The total resource 18cost test quantifies the net savings obtained through the 19substitution of demand-side measures for supply resources by 20comparing (i) the sum of avoided natural gas utility costs, 21representing the benefits that accrue to the natural gas 22system and the participant in the delivery of those energy 23efficiency measures and including avoided costs associated 24with the use of electricity or other fuels, avoided costs 25associated with reduced water consumption, avoided operation 26and maintenance costs, and avoided societal costs associated   HB3525- 14 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1with reductions in greenhouse gas emissions, as well as other 2quantifiable societal benefits and (ii) the sum of all 3incremental costs of end-use measures, including both utility 4and participant contribution costs to administer, deliver, and 5evaluate each demand-side measure. The societal costs 6associated with greenhouse gas emissions shall be assumed to 7be the greater of (i) $200 per short ton, expressed in 2024 8dollars, or (ii) the most recently approved estimate developed 9by the federal government using a real discount rate 10consistent with long-term U.S. Treasury bond yields. Changes 11in greenhouse gas emissions from changes in electricity 12consumption shall be estimated using long-run marginal 13emissions rates developed by the National Renewable Energy 14Laboratory's Cambium model or other State-specific modeling of 15comparable analytical rigor. In calculating avoided costs, 16reasonable estimates shall be included for financial costs 17likely to be imposed by future regulation of emissions of 18greenhouse gases. In discounting future societal costs and 19benefits for the purpose of calculating net present values, a 20societal discount rate based on actual, long-term U.S. 21Treasury bond yields shall be used. The income-qualified 22measures described in paragraphs (5) and (6) of subsection (d) 23shall not be required to meet the total resource cost test.24    (b) It is the policy of the State for gas utilities to be 25required to use cost-effective energy efficiency measures to 26reduce delivery load. Requiring investment in cost-effective   HB3525- 15 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1energy efficiency measures will reduce direct and indirect 2costs to consumers by decreasing environmental impacts, 3reducing the amount of natural gas and other utility-delivered 4gaseous fuels that need to be purchased, and avoiding or 5delaying the need for new transmission, distribution, storage, 6and other related infrastructure. Moreover, the public 7interest is served by allowing gas utilities to recover costs 8for reasonably and prudently incurred expenditures for energy 9efficiency measures. 10    (c) This Section applies to all gas distribution utilities 11in the State and supersedes Section 8-104 beginning January 1, 122027. 13    (d) Natural gas utilities shall implement cost-effective 14energy efficiency measures to achieve all of the following 15requirements: 16        (1) Total incremental annual savings shall be equal to 17    at least 0.6% of annual sales to distribution customers in 18    2027, 0.8% of such sales in 2028 and at least 1% of such 19    sales in 2029 and each subsequent year. For the purposes 20    of this Section, "incremental annual savings" means the 21    total gas savings from all measures installed in a 22    calendar year that will be realized within 12 months of 23    each measure's installation. For the purpose of 24    calculating savings as a percent of sales to distribution 25    customers for a given program year, the denominator of 26    sales to distribution customers shall be the annual   HB3525- 16 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    average sales over the second, third, and fourth full 2    calendar years prior to the beginning of the program year. 3        (2) The savings achieved must have an average life of 4    at least 12 years. In no event can more than one-fifth of 5    the incremental annual savings counted towards a utility's 6    annual savings goal in any given year be derived from 7    efficiency measures with average savings lives of less 8    than 5 years. For the purposes of this Section, "average 9    savings life" means the lifetime savings that would be 10    realized as a result of a utility's efficiency programs 11    divided by the incremental annual savings such programs 12    produce. Average savings lives may be shorter than the 13    average operational lives of measures installed if the 14    measures do not produce savings in every year in which 15    they operate or if the savings that the measures produce 16    decline during their operational lives. 17        (3) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this 18    subsection (d), savings may not be applied toward 19    achievement of utility savings goals if the savings arise 20    from the installation of efficient new gas furnaces, gas 21    boilers, gas water heaters, or other gas-consuming 22    equipment in a residential building, such as a 23    single-family, individually-metered multifamily, or 24    master-metered multifamily building. 25        (4) Savings may be applied toward achievement of 26    utility savings goals if the savings arise from the   HB3525- 17 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    installation of gas furnaces through income-eligible 2    programs when it is determined that the existing furnace 3    is no longer working, requires significant annual 4    maintenance costs in order to remain operational, or is 5    creating a health and safety hazard. 6        (5) At least 67% of the entire budget for efficiency 7    programs shall be spent on energy efficiency measures that 8    reduce space heating needs through improvements to the 9    efficiency of building envelopes, including, but not 10    limited to, insulation measures and efficient windows and 11    energy efficiency measures that reduce air leakage through 12    improvements to systems for distributing heat, including, 13    but not limited to, duct leakage reduction, duct 14    insulation, or pipe insulation in buildings or through 15    improved heating systems controls, including, but not 16    limited to, advanced thermostats and demand control 17    ventilation. Spending on efficient furnaces, efficient 18    boilers, or other efficient heating systems is permitted 19    within business efficiency programs but does not count 20    toward this minimum requirement for spending on building 21    envelope, heating distribution, and control efficiencies. 22    Spending on income-qualified building envelope measures, 23    heating distribution system measures, and heating controls 24    does count toward this requirement. The portion of 25    portfolio spending on program marketing, training of 26    installers, audits of buildings, inspections of work   HB3525- 18 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    performed, and other administrative and technical expenses 2    that are clearly tied to promotion or installation of 3    building envelope or heating distribution system measures 4    shall count toward this requirement. If this minimum 5    requirement is not met, any performance incentive earned 6    under subsection (h) should be reduced by the percentage 7    point level of shortfall in meeting this requirement.8        (6) The portion of the entire budget for efficiency 9    programs that is spent on efficiency measures for 10    income-qualified households shall be the greater of 25% or 11    5 percentage points more than the proportion of total 12    residential and business customer gas sales going to 13    income-qualified households. For purposes of this Section, 14    households at or below 80% of area median income are 15    income-qualified. At least 80% of spending on measures in 16    programs targeted at income-qualified households shall be 17    delivered through whole building weatherization programs 18    and spent on measures that reduce space heating needs 19    through improvements to the building envelope, heating 20    distribution systems, or heating controls. The utilities 21    shall invest in health and safety measures appropriate and 22    necessary for comprehensively weatherizing the homes and 23    multifamily buildings of income-qualified households, with 24    up to 15% of income-qualified program spending made 25    available for such purposes. The ratio of spending on 26    efficiency programs targeted at multifamily buildings of   HB3525- 19 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    income-qualified households to spending on energy 2    efficiency programs targeted at single-family buildings of 3    income-qualified households shall be designed to achieve 4    levels of savings from each building type that are 5    approximately proportional to the magnitude of 6    cost-effective lifetime savings potential in each building 7    type. The gas utilities shall participate in a Low-Income 8    Energy Efficiency Accountability Committee as established 9    in Section 8-103B.10        Gas utilities must conduct customer outreach and 11    education efforts in equity investment eligible 12    communities in order to provide notice of and explanations 13    concerning the following types of programs:14            (A) energy efficiency programs, the Illinois Solar 15        for All Program, and whole home retrofit programs that 16        reduce natural gas usage;17            (B) income-qualified financial assistance 18        programs, including rebate programs from the federal 19        government; and20            (C) general education programs designed to explain 21        utility bills and the decisions customers can make to 22        lower energy usage.23        These outreach and education efforts must be brought 24    to communities in a diversity of ways, must be created 25    with input from members of the communities, and must be 26    provided through, among other things:  HB3525- 20 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1            (i) information on customers' bills in the main 2        languages spoken in the communities;3            (ii) a quarterly posting in local newspapers that 4        cover the service area;5            (iii) a dedicated section on the investor-owned 6        utility's website; and7            (iv) in-person and virtual educational sessions 8        that take place in the income-qualified and Justice40 9        community, provide food and child care for 10        participating customers, and are codesigned with 11        interested community-based organization 12        representatives. 13        (7) Implementation of energy efficiency measures and 14    programs targeted at income-qualified households shall be 15    contracted, when practicable, to independent third parties 16    that have demonstrated the capability of serving those 17    households, with a preference for not-for-profit entities 18    and government agencies that have existing relationships 19    with, experience serving, or working directly within and 20    alongside income-qualified communities in the State. Each 21    gas utility shall develop and implement reporting 22    procedures that address and assist in determining the 23    amount of energy savings that can be applied to the 24    income-qualified procurement and expenditure requirements 25    set forth in this paragraph. 26        (8) A minimum of 10% of the utility's entire portfolio   HB3525- 21 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    funding level for a given year shall be used to procure 2    cost-effective energy efficiency measures from units of 3    local government, municipal corporations, school 4    districts, public housing, community college districts, 5    and nonprofit-owned buildings as long as a minimum 6    percentage of available funds shall be used to procure 7    energy efficiency from public housing, which percentage 8    shall be, at a minimum, equal to public housing's share of 9    public building energy consumption. Spending on public 10    housing may count toward minimum spending requirements on 11    efficiency improvements for income-qualified households. 12    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a utility 13providing approved energy efficiency measures in the State may 14recover all reasonable and prudently incurred costs of those 15measures from its retail customers. However, nothing in this 16subsection permits the double recovery of such costs from 17customers. 18    (f) Beginning in 2026, each gas utility shall file an 19energy efficiency plan with the Commission to meet the energy 20efficiency standards in subsection (d) for the next applicable 21multiyear period beginning January 1 of the year following the 22filing, according to the schedule set forth in paragraphs (1) 23through (4). If a utility does not file such a plan on or 24before the applicable filing deadline for the plan, the 25utility shall be liable for a civil penalty of $100,000 per day 26until the plan is filed.   HB3525- 22 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        (1) The energy efficiency plans of gas utilities that 2    were approved by the Commission for calendar years 2022 3    through 2025, including any stipulated agreements between 4    the utility and other parties that were approved by the 5    Commission, shall continue to be in force through calendar 6    year 2026. The utilities' savings goals for 2026 shall be 7    equal to the average annual savings goal approved for the 8    years 2022 through 2025. 9        (2) No later than March 1, 2026, each gas utility 10    shall file a 3-year energy efficiency plan that takes 11    effect on January 1, 2027 and is designed to achieve, 12    through implementation of emergency efficiency measures, 13    the incremental annual savings goals, minimum average 14    savings life, and other requirements specified in 15    paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (d). An energy 16    efficiency plan submitted by a gas utility under this 17    paragraph (2) supersedes any energy efficiency plan 18    previously filed by the gas utility for calendar year 2027 19    or thereafter. 20        (3) Beginning in 2029 and every 4 years thereafter, 21    each gas utility shall file by no later than March 1 of the 22    applicable year, a 4-year energy efficiency plan that 23    takes effect on the following January 1 and is designed to 24    achieve, through implementation of energy efficiency 25    measures, the incremental annual savings goals, minimum 26    average savings life, and other requirements specified in   HB3525- 23 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (d). However, the 2    incremental annual savings goals may be reduced if the 3    plan's analysis and forecasts of the utility's ability to 4    acquire energy savings demonstrate by clear and convincing 5    evidence and through independent analysis that achievement 6    of such goals is not cost-effective. In no event may 7    incremental annual savings goals for any year be reduced 8    to levels below (i) those actually achieved in the 9    calendar year before the plan filing, (ii) those forecast 10    to be achieved in the calendar year in which the plan 11    filing is made, or (iii) 0.75% of sales. The Commission 12    shall review any proposed goal reduction as part of its 13    review and approval of the utility's proposed plan. 14        (4) Each utility's plan shall set forth the utility's 15    proposals to meet the energy efficiency standards 16    identified in subsection (d). The Commission shall seek 17    public comment on each plan that takes effect on or after 18    January 1, 2027 and shall issue an order approving or 19    disapproving the plan within 6 months after its 20    submission. If the Commission disapproves a plan, the 21    Commission shall, within 30 days, describe in detail the 22    reasons for the disapproval and describe a path by which 23    the utility may file a revised draft of the plan to address 24    the Commission's concerns satisfactorily. If the utility 25    does not refile with the Commission within 60 days, the 26    utility shall be subject to civil penalties at a rate of   HB3525- 24 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    $100,000 per day until the plan is refiled. This process 2    shall continue, and penalties shall accrue, until the 3    utility has successfully filed a portfolio of energy 4    efficiency measures. Penalties shall be deposited into the 5    Energy Efficiency Trust Fund. 6    (g) In submitting proposed plans and funding levels under 7subsection (f) to meet the savings goals identified in 8subsection (d), the utility shall: 9        (1) demonstrate that its proposed energy efficiency 10    measures will achieve the requirements that are identified 11    in subsection (d); 12        (2) demonstrate consideration of program options for 13    supporting efforts to improve compliance with new building 14    codes, appliance standards, and municipal regulations as 15    potentially cost-effective means of acquiring energy 16    savings to count toward energy savings goals; 17        (3) demonstrate that its overall portfolio of measures 18    and programs, not including income-qualified programs 19    described in subsection (d), is cost-effective using the 20    total resource cost test and represents a diverse cross 21    section of opportunities for customers of all rate classes 22    to participate in programs. Individual measures need not 23    be cost-effective; 24        (4) demonstrate that the utility's plan integrates the 25    delivery of energy efficiency programs with electric 26    efficiency programs, programs promoting demand response,   HB3525- 25 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    and other efforts to address bill payment issues, 2    including, but not limited to, the Low Income Home Energy 3    Assistance Program and the Percentage of Income Payment 4    Plans; 5        (5) include a proposed or revised cost-recovery 6    mechanism to fund the proposed energy efficiency measures 7    and ensure the recovery of the prudently and reasonably 8    incurred costs of Commission-approved programs; 9        (6) provide, using not more than 3% of portfolio 10    resources in any given year, an annual independent 11    evaluation of the performance and cost-effectiveness of 12    the utility's portfolio of measures and programs; 13        (7) demonstrate how it will ensure that program 14    implementation contractors and energy efficiency 15    installation vendors will promote workforce equity and 16    quality jobs. Utilities shall collect, and make publicly 17    available at least quarterly, data necessary to 18    demonstrate how efforts are advancing workforce equity. 19    Utilities shall work with relevant vendors providing 20    education, training, and other resources needed to ensure 21    compliance and, where necessary, adjusting or terminating 22    work with vendors that cannot assist with compliance; and 23        (8) include any plans for research, development, or 24    pilot deployment of new measures or program approaches. 25    For utilities with unmodified savings goals, no more than 26    4% of energy efficiency portfolio spending may be   HB3525- 26 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    allocated for such purposes. For utilities with modified 2    savings goals, no more than 2% of energy efficiency 3    portfolio spending may be allocated for such purposes. 4    Utilities shall work with interested stakeholders to 5    formulate a plan for how any proposed funds should be 6    spent, incorporate statewide approaches for these 7    allocations whenever such approaches would be more 8    effective or cost-efficient, and demonstrate such 9    collaboration in the utilities' plans. 10    (h) Each gas utility shall be eligible to earn a 11shareholder incentive for effective implementation of its 12efficiency programs. The incentive shall be tied to each 13utility's annual energy efficiency spending and its savings. 14There shall be no incentive if the independent evaluator 15determines the utility either (i) did not fully meet all of the 16requirements specified in paragraphs (3) through (7) of 17subsection (d) or (ii) failed to achieve at least 90% of its 18lifetime savings goal. If a utility meets all of the 19requirements specified in paragraphs (3) through (7) of 20subsection (d), it can earn an incentive equal to 0.4% of the 21total annual efficiency spending in the year being evaluated 22for every one percentage point above 90% of its lifetime 23savings goal that it achieves for that year, with a maximum 24incentive of 12% for achieving 120% of its lifetime savings 25goal. For purposes of this subsection (h), "lifetime savings 26goal" means the product of a utility's incremental savings   HB3525- 27 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1goal specified in paragraph (1) of subsection (d) and the 2minimum average savings life specified in paragraph (2) of 3subsection (d). 4    (i) The utility shall submit energy savings data to the 5independent evaluator no later than 30 days after the close of 6the plan year. The independent evaluator shall determine the 7incremental annual savings and average savings life, as well 8as an estimate of the job impacts and other macroeconomic 9impacts of the efficiency programs for that year, achieved no 10later than 120 days after the close of the plan year. The 11utility shall submit an informational filing to the Commission 12no later than 160 days after the close of the plan year that 13attaches the independent evaluator's final report identifying 14the incremental annual savings for the year, identifying 15average savings life for the year, documenting compliance with 16other requirements in subsection (d), and, as applicable, the 17magnitude of any shareholder incentive which the utility has 18earned. 19    (j) Gas utilities shall report annually to the Commission 20and General Assembly on how hiring, contracting, job training, 21and other practices related to its energy efficiency programs 22enhance the diversity of vendors working on such programs. 23These reports must include data on vendor and employee 24diversity. 25    (k) The independent evaluator shall follow the guidelines 26and use the savings set forth in Commission-approved energy   HB3525- 28 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1efficiency policy manuals and technical reference manuals, as 2each may be updated from time to time. Until measure life 3values for energy efficiency measures implemented for 4income-qualified households are separately incorporated into 5such Commission-approved manuals, the income-qualified 6measures shall have the same measure life values that are 7established for the same measures implemented in households 8that are not income-qualified households.  9    (220 ILCS 5/9-228.5 new)10    Sec. 9-228.5. Consideration of gas main and gas service 11extension costs. Gas main and gas service extension policies 12shall be based on the principle that the full incremental cost 13associated with new development and growth shall be borne by 14the customers that cause those incremental costs. Gas main and 15gas service extension policies, procedures, and conditions 16shall align with the greenhouse gas emission reduction goals 17established in Article XXIV. 18    (220 ILCS 5/9-229)19    Sec. 9-229. Consideration of attorney and expert 20compensation as an expense and intervenor compensation fund. 21    (a) The Commission shall specifically assess the justness 22and reasonableness of any amount expended by a public utility 23to compensate attorneys or technical experts to prepare and 24litigate a general rate case filing. This issue shall be   HB3525- 29 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1expressly addressed in the Commission's final order.2    (b) The State of Illinois shall create a Consumer 3Intervenor Compensation Fund subject to the following:4        (1) Provision of compensation for Consumer Interest 5    Representatives that intervene in Illinois Commerce 6    Commission proceedings will increase public engagement, 7    encourage additional transparency, expand the information 8    available to the Commission, and improve decision-making.9        (2) As used in this Section, "consumer Consumer 10    interest representative" means:11            (A) a residential utility customer or group of 12        residential utility customers represented by a 13        not-for-profit group or organization registered with 14        the Illinois Attorney General under the Solicitation 15        for Charity Act;16            (B) representatives of not-for-profit groups or 17        organizations whose membership is limited to 18        residential utility customers; or19            (C) representatives of not-for-profit groups or 20        organizations whose membership includes Illinois 21        residents and that address the community, economic, 22        environmental, or social welfare of Illinois 23        residents, except government agencies or intervenors 24        specifically authorized by Illinois law to participate 25        in Commission proceedings on behalf of Illinois 26        consumers.  HB3525- 30 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        (3) A consumer interest representative is eligible to 2    receive compensation from the consumer intervenor 3    compensation fund if its participation included lay or 4    expert testimony or legal briefing and argument concerning 5    the expenses, investments, rate design, rate impact, or 6    other matters affecting the pricing, rates, costs or other 7    charges associated with utility service, the Commission 8    adopts a material recommendation related to a significant 9    issue in the docket, and participation caused a 10    significant financial cost hardship to the participant; 11    however, no consumer interest representative shall be 12    eligible to receive an award pursuant to this Section if 13    the consumer interest representative receives any 14    compensation, funding, or donations, directly or 15    indirectly, from parties that have a financial interest in 16    the outcome of the proceeding.17        (4) Within 30 days after September 15, 2021 (the 18    effective date of Public Act 102-662), each utility that 19    files a request for an increase in rates under Article IX 20    or Article XVI shall deposit an amount equal to one half of 21    the rate case attorney and expert expense allowed by the 22    Commission, but not to exceed $500,000, into the fund 23    within 35 days of the date of the Commission's Final final 24    Order in the rate case or 20 days after the denial of 25    rehearing under Section 10-113 of this Act, whichever is 26    later. The Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund shall be   HB3525- 31 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    used to provide payment to consumer interest 2    representatives as described in this Section.3        (5) An electric public utility with 3,000,000 or more 4    retail customers shall contribute $450,000 to the Consumer 5    Intervenor Compensation Fund within 60 days after 6    September 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 7    102-662). A combined electric and gas public utility 8    serving fewer than 3,000,000 but more than 500,000 retail 9    customers shall contribute $225,000 to the Consumer 10    Intervenor Compensation Fund within 60 days after 11    September 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 12    102-662). A gas public utility with 1,500,000 or more 13    retail customers that is not a combined electric and gas 14    public utility shall contribute $225,000 to the Consumer 15    Intervenor Compensation Fund within 60 days after 16    September 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 17    102-662). A gas public utility with fewer than 1,500,000 18    retail customers but more than 300,000 retail customers 19    that is not a combined electric and gas public utility 20    shall contribute $80,000 to the Consumer Intervenor 21    Compensation Fund within 60 days after September 15, 2021 22    (the effective date of Public Act 102-662). A gas public 23    utility with fewer than 300,000 retail customers that is 24    not a combined electric and gas public utility shall 25    contribute $20,000 to the Consumer Intervenor Compensation 26    Fund within 60 days after September 15, 2021 (the   HB3525- 32 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    effective date of Public Act 102-662). A combined electric 2    and gas public utility serving fewer than 500,000 retail 3    customers shall contribute $20,000 to the Consumer 4    Intervenor Compensation Fund within 60 days after 5    September 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 6    102-662). A water or sewer public utility serving more 7    than 100,000 retail customers shall contribute $80,000, 8    and a water or sewer public utility serving fewer than 9    100,000 but more than 10,000 retail customers shall 10    contribute $20,000.11        (6)(A) Prior to the entry of a Final Order in a 12    docketed case, the Commission Administrator shall provide 13    a payment to a consumer interest representative that 14    demonstrates through a verified application for funding 15    that the consumer interest representative's participation 16    or intervention without an award of fees or costs imposes 17    a significant financial hardship based on a schedule to be 18    developed by the Commission. The Administrator may require 19    verification of costs incurred, including statements of 20    hours spent, as a condition to paying the consumer 21    interest representative prior to the entry of a Final 22    Order in a docketed case.23        (B) If the Commission adopts a material recommendation 24    related to a significant issue in the docket and 25    participation caused a significant financial cost hardship 26    to the participant, then the consumer interest   HB3525- 33 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    representative shall be allowed payment for some or all of 2    the consumer interest representative's reasonable 3    attorney's or advocate's fees, reasonable expert witness 4    fees, and other reasonable costs of preparation for and 5    participation in a hearing or proceeding. Expenses related 6    to travel or meals shall not be compensable.7        (C) The consumer interest representative shall submit 8    an itemized request for compensation to the Consumer 9    Intervenor Compensation Fund, including the advocate's or 10    attorney's reasonable fee rate, the number of hours 11    expended, reasonable expert and expert witness fees, and 12    other reasonable costs for the preparation for and 13    participation in the hearing and briefing within 30 days 14    of the Commission's final order after denial or decision 15    on rehearing, if any.16        (7) Administration of the Fund.17        (A) The Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund is 18    created as a special fund in the State treasury. All 19    disbursements from the Consumer Intervenor Compensation 20    Fund shall be made only upon warrants of the Comptroller 21    drawn upon the Treasurer as custodian of the Fund upon 22    vouchers signed by the Executive Director of the 23    Commission or by the person or persons designated by the 24    Director for that purpose. The Comptroller is authorized 25    to draw the warrant upon vouchers so signed. The Treasurer 26    shall accept all warrants so signed and shall be released   HB3525- 34 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    from liability for all payments made on those warrants. 2    The Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund shall be 3    administered by an Administrator that is a person or 4    entity that is independent of the Commission. The 5    administrator will be responsible for the prudent 6    management of the Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund 7    and for recommendations for the award of consumer 8    intervenor compensation from the Consumer Intervenor 9    Compensation Fund. The Commission shall issue a request 10    for qualifications for a third-party program administrator 11    to administer the Consumer Intervenor Compensation Fund. 12    The third-party administrator shall be chosen through a 13    competitive bid process based on selection criteria and 14    requirements developed by the Commission. The Illinois 15    Procurement Code does not apply to the hiring or payment 16    of the Administrator. All Administrator costs may be paid 17    for using monies from the Consumer Intervenor Compensation 18    Fund, but the Program Administrator shall strive to 19    minimize costs in the implementation of the program.20        (B) The computation of compensation awarded from the 21    fund shall take into consideration the market rates paid 22    to persons of comparable training and experience who offer 23    similar services, but may not exceed the comparable market 24    rate for services paid by the public utility as part of its 25    rate case expense.26        (C)(1) Recommendations on the award of compensation by   HB3525- 35 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    the administrator shall include consideration of whether 2    the participation raised Commission adopted a material 3    recommendation related to a significant issue in the 4    docket and whether participation caused a significant 5    financial cost hardship to the participant and the payment 6    of compensation is fair, just, and reasonable.7        (2) Recommendations on the award of compensation by 8    the administrator shall be submitted to the Commission for 9    approval. Unless the Commission initiates an investigation 10    within 45 days after the notice to the Commission, the 11    award of compensation shall be allowed 45 days after 12    notice to the Commission. Such notice shall be given by 13    filing with the Commission on the Commission's e-docket 14    system, and keeping open for public inspection the award 15    for compensation proposed by the Administrator. The 16    Commission shall have power, and it is hereby given 17    authority, either upon complaint or upon its own 18    initiative without complaint, at once, and if it so 19    orders, without answer or other formal pleadings, but upon 20    reasonable notice, to enter upon a hearing concerning the 21    propriety of the award.22    (c) The Commission may adopt rules to implement this 23Section.24(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 25    (220 ILCS 5/9-235 new)  HB3525- 36 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    Sec. 9-235. Tariffed gas main and gas service extension 2provisions. No later than 60 days after the effective date of 3this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 4Commission shall initiate a docketed rulemaking reviewing each 5gas public utility tariff that provides for gas main and gas 6service extensions without additional charge to new customers 7in excess of the default extensions without charge as 8specified in 83 Ill. Adm. Code 501. The focus of the rulemaking 9shall be to modify each gas utility's gas main and gas service 10extension tariff to align with the provisions set forth in 11Section 9-228.5. 12    (220 ILCS 5/9-241)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 9-241)13    Sec. 9-241. Nondiscrimination. 14    (a) No public utility shall, as to rates or other charges, 15services, facilities, or in other respect, make or grant any 16preference or advantage to any corporation or person or 17subject any corporation or person to any prejudice or 18disadvantage. No public utility shall establish or maintain 19any unreasonable difference as to rates or other charges, 20services, facilities, or in any other respect, either as 21between localities or as between classes of service.22    (b) An electric utility in a county with a population of 233,000,000 or more shall not establish or maintain any 24unreasonable difference as to rates or other charges, 25services, contractual terms, or facilities for access to or   HB3525- 37 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1the use of its utility infrastructure by another person or for 2any other purpose. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 3the Commission and its staff shall interpret this Section in 4accordance with Article XVI of this Act. 5     (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as 6limiting the authority of the Commission to permit the 7establishment of economic development rates as incentives to 8economic development either in enterprise zones as designated 9by the State of Illinois or in other areas of a utility's 10service area. Such rates should be available to existing 11businesses which demonstrate an increase to existing load as 12well as new businesses which create new load for a utility so 13as to create a more balanced utilization of generating 14capacity. The Commission shall ensure that such rates are 15established at a level which provides a net benefit to 16customers within a public utility's service area.17    (d) On or before January 1, 2026 2023, the Commission 18shall conduct a comprehensive study to assess whether 19low-income discount rates for electric and natural gas 20residential customers are appropriate and the potential design 21and implementation of any such rates. The Commission shall 22include its findings, together with the appropriate 23recommendations, in a report to be provided to the General 24Assembly. Upon completion of the study, the Commission shall 25have the authority to permit or require electric and natural 26gas utilities to file a tariff establishing low-income   HB3525- 38 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1discount rates.2    Such study shall assess, at a minimum, the following:3        (1) customer eligibility requirements, including 4    income-based eligibility and eligibility based on 5    participation in or eligibility for certain public 6    assistance programs;7        (2) appropriate rate structures, including 8    consideration of tiered discounts for different income 9    levels;10        (3) appropriate recovery mechanisms, including the 11    consideration of volumetric charges and customer charges;12        (4) appropriate verification mechanisms;13        (5) measures to ensure customer confidentiality and 14    data safeguards;15        (6) outreach and consumer education procedures; and16        (7) the impact that a low-income discount rate would 17    have on the affordability of delivery service to 18    low-income customers and customers overall.19    On or before January 1, 2027, the Commission shall begin a 20docketed rulemaking process to implement low-income discount 21rates for electric and natural gas residential customers, 22incorporating the recommendations of the report required by 23this Section, released by the Commission in December 2022 and 24titled the "Illinois Commerce Commission Low-Income Discount 25Rate Study Report to the Illinois General Assembly". 26    (e) The Commission shall adopt rules requiring utility   HB3525- 39 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1companies to produce information, in the form of a mailing, 2and other approved methods of distribution, to its consumers, 3to inform the consumers of available rebates, discounts, 4credits, and other cost-saving mechanisms that can help them 5lower their monthly utility bills, and send out such 6information semi-annually, unless otherwise provided by this 7Article. 8    (f) Prior to October 1, 1989, no public utility providing 9electrical or gas service shall consider the use of solar or 10other nonconventional renewable sources of energy by a 11customer as a basis for establishing higher rates or charges 12for any service or commodity sold to such customer; nor shall a 13public utility subject any customer utilizing such energy 14source or sources to any other prejudice or disadvantage on 15account of such use. No public utility shall without the 16consent of the Commission, charge or receive any greater 17compensation in the aggregate for a lesser commodity, product, 18or service than for a greater commodity, product, or service 19of like character.20    The Commission, in order to expedite the determination of 21rate questions, or to avoid unnecessary and unreasonable 22expense, or to avoid unjust or unreasonable discrimination 23between classes of customers, or, whenever in the judgment of 24the Commission public interest so requires, may, for rate 25making and accounting purposes, or either of them, consider 26one or more municipalities either with or without the adjacent   HB3525- 40 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1or intervening rural territory as a regional unit where the 2same public utility serves such region under substantially 3similar conditions, and may within such region prescribe 4uniform rates for consumers or patrons of the same class.5    Any public utility, with the consent and approval of the 6Commission, may as a basis for the determination of the 7charges made by it classify its service according to the 8amount used, the time when used, the purpose for which used, 9and other relevant factors.10(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 103-679, eff. 7-19-24.) 11    (220 ILCS 5/9-254 new)12    Sec. 9-254. Independent gas system assessment.13    (a) The General Assembly finds that an independent audit 14of the current state of the gas distribution system, and of the 15expenditures made since 2012, will need to be made. 16Specifically, the General Assembly finds:17        (1) Pursuant to 2013 legislation establishing the 18    qualifying infrastructure plant charge, gas utilities in 19    this State that serve over 700,000 retail customers have 20    spent significant amounts of ratepayer dollars on system 21    investments purporting to refurbish, rebuild, modernize, 22    and expand gas system infrastructure.23        (2) The qualifying infrastructure plant charge is set 24    to conclude at its statutory deadline of December 31, 25    2023, and it is in the interest of this State and in the   HB3525- 41 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    interest of gas utilities' customers to understand the 2    benefits of these investments to the gas system and to 3    customers and to evaluate the current condition of the gas 4    system.5        (3) It is also necessary for gas utilities, the 6    Commission, and stakeholders to have an independently 7    verified set of data to draw upon for future gas rate cases 8    and any other proposed gas system spending.9        (4) Meeting the State's climate goals will require an 10    ordered transition away from gas, and toward electric 11    heating and appliances, for all or nearly all buildings, 12    and planning this transition will require a thorough 13    understanding of the current state of the gas system.14        (5) The Commission has authority to order and 15    implement the requirements of this Section under Section 16    8-102.17    (b) Terms used in this Section shall have the meanings 18given to them in Section 19-105.19    (c) Within 30 days after the effective date of this 20amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Commission 21shall issue an order initiating an audit of each gas utility 22serving over 700,000 retail customers in the State, which 23shall examine the following:24        (1) An assessment of the gas distribution system, as 25    described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a). The 26    Commission shall have the authority to require additional   HB3525- 42 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    items that it deems necessary.2        (2) An analysis of the utility's capital projects 3    placed into service in the preceding 10 years, including, 4    but not limited to, an assessment of the value and safety 5    impact of pipe replacement, increased system pressure, and 6    pipe capacity expansion.7        (3) An assessment of the utility's emissions 8    reductions to date and what preparations the utility has 9    made to meet the terms of the Paris Climate Agreement, 10    with which it is the policy of the State to comply.11        (4) The creation of a visual, geographic map of the 12    gas system displaying the level of risk of various 13    pipelines and showing the areas where pipelines have 14    already been replaced.15        (5) The identifying areas of the gas system where the 16    cost to replace pipeline is likely to be high, including, 17    but not limited to, identifying places where 18    decommissioning a portion of the gas system and planning 19    to provide for electric heating and appliance needs in 20    that area may be preferable, considering the costs and 21    benefits for affordability, health, and climate.22    (d) It is contemplated that the auditor will use materials 23filed with the Commission by the utilities with respect to the 24auditor's expenditures in the preceding 10 years; however, the 25auditor may also, with Commission approval, assess other 26information deemed necessary to make its report. The results   HB3525- 43 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1of the audit described in this Section shall be reflected in a 2report delivered to the Commission, describing the information 3specified in this Section. The report is to be delivered no 4later than 180 days after the Commission enters its order 5under subsection (c). It is understood that any public report 6may not contain items that are confidential or proprietary.7    (e) The costs of a gas utility's audit described in this 8Section shall not exceed $500,000 and shall be paid for by the 9electric utility that is the subject of the audit. Such costs 10shall be a recoverable expense.11    (f) The Commission shall have the authority to retain the 12services of an auditor to assist with the distribution 13planning process, as well as in docketed proceedings. Such 14expenses for these activities shall also be borne by the 15Commission. 16    (220 ILCS 5/9-255 new)17    Sec. 9-255. Phase-out of gas fixed changes. Beginning 18January 1, 2035, a public utility providing gas service may 19not assess fixed charges as part of its rates. Beginning 20January 1, 2030, a public utility providing gas service must 21limit, for each customer class, any fixed charges in its rates 22to no greater than 50% of the average of monthly fixed charges 23for that customer class during the period January 1, 2019 to 24December 31, 2021.   HB3525- 44 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    (220 ILCS 5/16-111.10)2    Sec. 16-111.10. Equitable Energy Upgrade Program.3    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that Illinois 4homes and businesses can contribute to the creation of a clean 5energy economy, conservation of natural resources, and 6reliability of the electricity grid through the installation 7of cost-effective renewable energy generation, energy 8efficiency and demand response equipment, and energy storage 9systems. Further, a large portion of Illinois residents and 10businesses that would benefit from the installation of energy 11efficiency, storage, and renewable energy generation systems 12are unable to purchase systems due to capital or credit 13barriers. This State should pursue options to enable many more 14Illinoisans to access the health, environmental, and financial 15benefits of new clean energy technology.16    (b) As used in this Section:17    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.18    "Energy project" means renewable energy generation 19systems, including solar projects, energy efficiency upgrades, 20decarbonization and electrification measures, energy storage 21systems, demand response equipment, or any combination 22thereof.23    "Fund" means the Clean Energy Jobs and Justice Fund 24established in the Clean Energy Jobs and Justice Fund Act.25    "Program" means the Equitable Energy Upgrade Program 26established under subsection (c).  HB3525- 45 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    "Utility" means electric public utilities providing 2services to 500,000 or more customers under this Act.3    (c) The Commission shall open an investigation into and 4direct all electric and gas public utilities in this State to 5adopt an Equitable Energy Upgrade Program that permits 6customers to finance the construction of energy projects 7through an optional tariff payable directly through their 8utility bill, modeled after the Pay As You Save system, 9developed by the Energy Efficiency Institute. The Program 10model shall enable utilities to offer to make investments in 11energy projects to customer properties with low-cost capital 12and use an opt-in tariff to recover the costs. The Program 13shall be designed to provide customers with immediate 14financial savings if they choose to participate. The Program 15shall allow residential electric and gas utility customers 16that own the property, or renters that have permission of the 17property owner, for which they subscribe to utility service to 18agree to the installation of an energy project. The Program 19shall ensure:20        (1) eligible projects do not require upfront payments; 21    however, customers may pay down the costs for projects 22    with a payment to the installing contractor in order to 23    qualify projects that would otherwise require upfront 24    payments;25        (2) eligible projects have sufficient estimated 26    savings and estimated life span to produce significant,   HB3525- 46 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    immediate net savings;2        (3) participants shall agree the utility can recover 3    its costs for the projects at their location by paying for 4    the project through an optional tariff directly through 5    the participant's utility electricity bill, allowing 6    participants to benefit from installation of energy 7    projects without traditional loans;8        (4) accessibility by lower-income residents and 9    environmental justice community residents; and10        (5) the utility must ensure that customers who are 11    interested in participating are notified that if they are 12    income qualified, they may also be eligible for the 13    Percentage of Income Payment Plan program and free energy 14    improvements through other programs and facilitate 15    interested customers' enrollment in those programs; and 16    provide contact information.17        (6) coordination with existing utility, state, and 18    federal energy efficiency, solar, electrification, and 19    other energy savings funding and implementation programs. 20    (d) The Commission shall establish Program guidelines with 21the anticipated schedule of Program availability as follows:22        (1) Year 1: Beginning in the first year of operation, 23    each utility with greater than 100,000 retail customers is 24    required to obtain low-cost capital of at least 25    $20,000,000 annually for investments in energy projects.26        (2) Year 2: Beginning in the second year of operation,   HB3525- 47 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    each utility with greater than 100,000 retail customers is 2    required to obtain low-cost capital for investments in 3    energy projects of at least $40,000,000 annually.4        (3) Year 3: Beginning in the third year of operation, 5    each utility with greater than 100,000 retail customers is 6    required to obtain low-cost capital for investments in as 7    many systems as customers demand, subject to available 8    capital provided by the utility, State, or other lenders.9    (e) In the design of the Program, the Commission shall:10        (1) Within 90 days after the effective date of this 11    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, begin a 12    process to update the Program guidelines for 13    implementation of the Program. Any such process shall 14    allow for participation from interested stakeholders. 15    Within 270 days after the effective date of this 16    amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, convene a 17    workshop during which interested participants may discuss 18    issues and submit comments related to the Program.19        (2) Establish Program guidelines for implementation of 20    the Program in accordance with the Pay As You Save 21    Essential Elements and Minimum Program Requirements that 22    electric and gas utilities must abide by when implementing 23    the Program. Program guidelines established by the 24    Commission shall include the following elements:25            (A) The Commission shall establish conditions 26        under which utilities secure capital to fund the   HB3525- 48 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        energy projects. The Commission may allow utilities to 2        raise capital independently, work with third-party 3        lenders to secure the capital for participants, or a 4        combination thereof. Any process the Commission 5        approves must use a market mechanism to identify the 6        least costly sources of capital funds so as to pass on 7        maximum savings to participants. The State or the 8        Clean Energy Jobs and Justice Fund may also provide 9        capital for the Program.10            (B) Customer protection guidelines should be 11        designed consistent with Pay As You Save Essential 12        Elements and Minimum Program Requirements.13            (C) The Commission shall establish conditions by 14        which utilities may connect Program participants to 15        energy project vendors. In setting conditions for 16        connection, the Commission may prioritize vendors that 17        have a history of good relations with the State, 18        including vendors that have hired participants from 19        State-created job training programs.20            (D) Guarantee that conservative estimates of 21        financial savings will immediately and significantly 22        exceed estimated Program costs for Program 23        participants.24            (E) Require any customer data sharing between 25        electric and gas utilities and third-party vendors 26        needed to evaluate the energy and demand saving and   HB3525- 49 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        energy services revenue opportunities of all customers 2        and otherwise facilitate a positive customer 3        experience. Such data sharing may include but shall 4        not be limited to historical and ongoing customer 5        usage data and billing rates. The Commission may allow 6        utilities to recover the costs associated with data 7        sharing from all customers.8            (F) Notwithstanding the method used to estimate 9        site-specific energy savings or measure direct energy 10        savings for Program participants, the utility will 11        report aggregate savings to the Commission for 12        regulatory filings in the same or a similar manner as 13        other energy efficiency or clean energy programs. 14    (f) Within 90 120 days after the Commission releases the 15Program conditions established under this Section, each 16utility subject to the requirements of this Section shall 17submit an informational filing to the Commission that 18describes its plan for implementing the provisions of this 19Section. If the Commission finds that the submission does not 20properly comply with the statutory or regulatory requirements 21of the Program, the Commission may require that the utility 22make modifications to its filing.23    (g) An independent process evaluation shall be conducted 24after one year of the Program's operation. An independent 25impact evaluation shall be conducted after 3 years of 26operation, excluding one-time startup costs and results from   HB3525- 50 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1the first 12 months of the Program. The Commission shall 2convene an advisory council of stakeholders, including 3representation of low-income and environmental justice 4community members to make recommendations in response to the 5findings of the independent evaluation.6    (h) The Program shall be designed using the Pay As You Save 7system guidelines to be cost-effective for customers. Only 8projects that are deemed to be cost-effective and can be 9reasonably expected to ensure customer savings are eligible 10for funding through the Program, unless, as specified in 11paragraph (1) of subsection (c), customers able to make 12upfront copayments to installers buy down the cost of projects 13so it can be deemed cost-effective.14    (i) Eligible customers must be:15        (1) property renters with permission of the property 16    owner; or17        (2) property owners.18    (j) The calculation of project cost-effectiveness shall be 19based upon the Pay As You Save system requirements.20        (1) The calculation of cost-effectiveness must be 21    conducted by an objective process approved by the 22    Commission and based on rates in effect at the time of 23    installation.24        (2) A project shall be considered cost-effective only 25    if it is estimated to produce significant immediate net 26    savings, not counting copayments voluntarily made by   HB3525- 51 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    customers. The Commission may establish guidelines by 2    which this required savings is estimated.3        (3) Net savings shall include savings across all fuel 4    sources, not limited to electricity and natural gas.5        (4) The calculation of project cost-effectiveness 6    shall not exclude projects that:7            (A) would raise customer costs in a particular 8        month so long as customers see annual project savings; 9        or10            (B) increase electric load and accompanying costs 11        when a heating electrification project results in the 12        ability to cool part or all of a home that was not 13        previously cooled. In such cases, the increased 14        electricity consumption associated with that added 15        cooling shall not be included in calculations of net 16        savings. Extreme heat poses an increasing risk to 17        Illinois communities. As such, it is in the public 18        interest to mitigate that risk through the addition of 19        building cooling systems.20        However, any expected increase in electric load and 21    customer costs should be clearly communicated to impacted 22    customers, along with any options for mitigating that 23    increase. 24    (k) The Program should be modeled after the Pay As You Save 25system, by which Program participants finance energy projects 26using the savings that the energy project creates with a   HB3525- 52 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1tariffed on-bill program. Eligible projects shall not create 2personal debt for the customer, result in a lien in the event 3of nonpayment, or require customers to pay monthly charges for 4any upgrade that fails and is not repaired within 21 days. The 5utility may restart charges once the upgrade is repaired and 6functioning and extend the term of payments to recover its 7costs for missed payments and deferred cost recovery, 8providing the upgrade continues to function. 9    (l) Any energy project that is defective or damaged due to 10no fault of the participant must be either replaced or 11repaired with parts that meet industry standards at the cost 12of the utility or vendor, as specified by the Commission, and 13charges shall be suspended until repairs or replacement is 14completed. The Commission may establish, increase, or replace 15the requirements imposed in this subsection. The Commission 16may determine that this responsibility is best handled by 17participating project vendors in the form of insurance, 18contractual guarantees, or other mechanisms, and issue rules 19detailing this requirement. Customers shall not be charged 20monthly payments for upgrades that are no longer functioning. 21    (m) In the event of nonpayment, the remaining balance due 22to pay off the system shall remain with the utility meter at an 23upgraded location. The Commission shall establish conditions 24subject to this constraint in the event of nonpayment that are 25in accordance with the Pay As You Save system.26    (n) The utility shall make every effort to ensure that   HB3525- 53 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1customers who are income-qualified for free energy upgrade 2programs take full advantage of those programs first before 3using the Equitable Energy Upgrade Program. If the demand by 4utility customers exceeds the Program capital supply in a 5given year, utilities shall ensure that 50% of participants 6are:7        (1) customers in neighborhoods where a majority of 8    households make 150% or less of area median income; or9        (2) residents of environmental justice communities.10    (o) Utilities shall endeavor to inform customers about the 11availability of the Program, their potential eligibility for 12participation in the Program, and whether they are likely to 13save money on the basis of an estimate conducted using 14variables consistent with the Program that the utility has at 15its disposal. The Commission may establish guidelines by which 16utilities must abide by this directive and alternatives if the 17Commission deems utilities' efforts as inadequate.18    (p) Subject to Commission specifications under subsection 19(c), each utility shall work with certified project vendors 20selected using a request for proposals process to establish 21the terms and processes under which a utility can install 22eligible renewable energy generation and energy storage 23systems using the capital to fit the Equitable Energy Upgrade 24model. The utility certified project vendor shall explain and 25offer the approved upgrades to customers and shall assist 26customers in applying for financing through the Program. As   HB3525- 54 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1part of the process, utilities vendors shall also provide 2participants with information about any other relevant 3incentives that may be available and customer service 4regarding the effective use of the upgrades.5    Nothing shall preclude gas and electric utilities that 6have overlapping service territories from jointly implementing 7and delivering the Program. 8    (q) A participating An electric utility shall recover all 9of the prudently incurred costs of offering a program approved 10by the Commission under this Section. For investor-owned 11utilities, shareholder incentives will be proportional to 12meeting Commission approved thresholds for the number of 13customers served and the amount of its investments in those 14locations.15    (r) The Commission shall adopt all rules necessary for the 16administration of this Section. 17(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 18    (220 ILCS 5/Art. XXIII heading new)19ARTICLE XXIII. CLEAN BUILDING HEATING LAW 20    (220 ILCS 5/23-101 new)21    Sec. 23-101. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 22Clean Building Heating Law. References in this Article to 23"this Act" mean this Article.   HB3525- 55 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    (220 ILCS 5/23-102 new)2    Sec. 23-102. Findings. The General Assembly finds that the 3adoption and use of clean, zero-pollution space and water 4heating appliances in residential and commercial buildings 5would benefit the State by (i) protecting the air that 6Illinoisans breathe through reducing unhealthy levels of smog 7and ozone, (ii) minimizing health risks associated with air 8pollution, including respiratory ailments, cardiovascular 9illnesses, and premature death, which are linked to exposure 10to fine particulate matter and nitrogen dioxide, (iii) 11assisting the State in achieving attainment of federal 12National Ambient Air Quality Standards for ozone and meeting 13the State's obligations under the federal Regional Haze Rule, 14(iv) reducing climate pollution in service to the State's 15net-zero greenhouse gas goals, and (v) contributing to the 16State's economy through building and mobilizing a trained and 17competitive workforce to install and maintain newly purchased 18appliances. 19    (220 ILCS 5/23-103 new)20    Sec. 23-103. Definitions. As used in this Article:21    "Annual fuel utilization efficiency" or "AFUE" means the 22efficiency as defined by Section 4.2.35 of the Code of Federal 23Regulations, Title 10, Part 430, Subpart B, Appendix N.24    "Boiler" or "water heater" means a product used to heat 25water or produce steam and that is not exclusively used to   HB3525- 56 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1produce electricity for sale. "Boiler" does not include any 2waste heat recovery boiler that is used to recover sensible 3heat from the exhaust of a combustion turbine or any unfired 4waste heat recovery boiler that is used to recover sensible 5heat from the exhaust of any combustion equipment.6    "Btu" means British thermal unit, which is a scientific 7unit of measurement equal to the quantity of heat required to 8raise the temperature of one pound of water by one degree 9Fahrenheit at approximately 60 degrees Fahrenheit.10    "Director" means the Director of the Environmental 11Protection Agency or the Director's designee.12    "Fan-type central furnace" means a self-contained space 13heater providing for circulation of heated air at pressures 14other than atmospheric through ducts more than 25 cm (10 in) in 15length.16    "Furnace" means a product designed to be a source of 17interior space heating. 18    "Heat input" means the heat released by the combustion of 19fuels in a unit based on the higher heating value of fuel, 20excluding the enthalpy of incoming combustion air.21    "Heat output" means the product obtained by multiplying 22the recovery efficiency, as defined by Section 6.1.3 of the 23Code of Federal Regulation, Title 10, Part 430, Subpart B, 24Appendix E, by the input rating of the unit.25    "NOx" and "NOx emissions" means the sum of nitric oxide and 26nitrogen dioxide in the unit's flue gas, collectively   HB3525- 57 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1expressed as nitrogen dioxide.2    "Rated heat input capacity" means the heat input capacity 3specified on the nameplate of the combustion unit. If a unit 4has been altered or modified such that its maximum heat input 5is different from the heat input capacity specified on the 6nameplate, the new maximum heat input is the unit's rated heat 7input capacity.8    "Useful heat delivered to the heated space" means the 9annual fuel utilization efficiency (expressed as a fraction) 10multiplied by the heat input. 11    (220 ILCS 5/23-104 new)12    Sec. 23-104. Applicability. This Article applies to any 13person who sells, installs, offers for sale, leases, or offers 14for lease the following products in this State, as well as any 15manufacturer who intends to sell or distribute for sale or 16installation the following products in this State: (i) new 17water heaters and boilers with a rated heat input capacity of 182,000,000 Btus per hour or less; and (ii) new furnaces with a 19rated heat input capacity of 175,000 Btus per hour or less, 20and, in the case of combination heating and cooling units, a 21cooling rate of 65,000 Btus per hour or less. 22    (220 ILCS 5/23-105 new)23    Sec. 23-105. Emissions standards for new building heating 24and water heating appliances.  HB3525- 58 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    (a) On and after January 1, 2027, a person shall not sell, 2install, offer for sale, lease, or offer for lease, and a 3manufacturer shall not sell or distribute for sale or 4installation, the following new products in this State:5        (1) water heaters with a rated heat input capacity of 6    75,000 Btus per hour or less, and any water heaters with 7    power assist, that emit more than 10 nanograms of NOx per 8    joule of heat output;9        (2) water heaters and boilers with a rated heat input 10    capacity from 75,001 to 2,000,000 Btus per hour, 11    inclusive, that emit more than 14 nanograms of NOx per 12    joule of heat output; or13        (3) fan-type central furnaces with a rated heat input 14    capacity of 175,000 Btus per hour or less that emit more 15    than 14 nanograms of NOx per joule of heat output.16    (b) On and after January 1, 2030, a person shall not sell, 17install, offer for sale, lease, or offer for lease, and a 18manufacturer shall not sell or distribute for sale or 19installation, the following new products in this State:20        (1) water heaters and boilers with a rated heat input 21    capacity of 2,000,000 Btus per hour or less that emit more 22    than 0.0 nanograms of NOx per joule of heat output; or23        (2) furnaces with a rated heat input capacity of 24    175,000 Btus per hour or less that emit more than 0.0 25    nanograms of NOx per joule of heat output. This includes 26    non-central installations, such as wall furnaces, as well   HB3525- 59 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    as units installed in non-residential applications. 2    (220 ILCS 5/23-106 new)3    Sec. 23-106. Certification and identification of compliant 4products.5    (a) The manufacturer shall obtain confirmation from an 6independent testing laboratory that each water heater, boiler, 7or furnace model that is subject to the requirements of this 8Article and that the manufacturer intends to sell or 9distribute for sale or installation into the State has been 10tested in accordance with the procedures in Section 23-107. 11This confirmation shall include the following statement signed 12and dated by the person responsible for the report at the 13independent testing laboratory: "Based on my inquiry of those 14individuals with primary responsibility for obtaining the 15information, I certify that the statements and information in 16this source test report are to the best of my knowledge and 17belief true, accurate, and complete. I am aware that there are 18significant civil and criminal penalties for submitting false 19statements or information or omitting required statements or 20information, including the possibility of fine or 21imprisonment."22    (b) For each such product model, the manufacturer shall 23submit to the Director either of the following:24        (1) A statement that each product model meets the 25    emission standards set forth in Section 23-105. The   HB3525- 60 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    statement must:2            (A) provide the following general information: 3        name and address of manufacturer, brand name, trade 4        name, model number, and rated heat input capacity;5            (B) provide a description of the model being 6        certified;7            (C) include a complete certification source test 8        report demonstrating that the product model was tested 9        in accordance with procedures in Section 23-107 and a 10        written statement that the model complies with Section 11        23-105;12            (D) include the following statement signed and 13        dated by a managerial level employee responsible for 14        the certification request at the manufacturer: "Based 15        on my inquiry of those individuals with primary 16        responsibility for obtaining the information, I 17        certify that the statements and information in this 18        request for certification are to the best of my 19        knowledge and belief true, accurate, and complete. I 20        am aware that there are significant civil and criminal 21        penalties for submitting false statements or 22        information or omitting required statements or 23        information, including the possibility of fine or 24        imprisonment.";25            (E) be submitted to the Director no more than 90 26        days after the date of the emissions compliance test   HB3525- 61 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        conducted in accordance with Section 23-107; and2            (F) be submitted to the Director no less than 90 3        days before the intention to sell or distribute a new 4        product model within the State or no less than 90 days 5        before the dates described in Section 23-105.6        (2) An approved South Coast Air Quality Management 7    District (SCAQMD) certification for each product model 8    issued pursuant to SCAQMD Rules 1111, 1121, or 1146.2, to 9    demonstrate compliance with subsection (a) of Section 10    23-105.11    (c) The manufacturer shall display the model number and 12the certification status of a product complying with this 13Article on the shipping carton and rating plate of each unit. 14    (220 ILCS 5/23-107 new)15    Sec. 23-107. Determination of emissions. Emissions from 16products subject to the requirements of this Article shall be 17tested in accordance with the following provisions:18        (1) Each product model shall receive certification 19    based on emission tests of a randomly selected unit of 20    that model.21        (2) The measurement of NOx emissions shall be 22    conducted in accordance with EPA Reference Method 7 (40 23    CFR Part 60, Appendix A), Test Methods 7A-7E.24        (3) Each tested water heater shall be operated in 25    accordance with Section 2.4 of American National Standards   HB3525- 62 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    ANSI Z21.10.1-1990 at normal test pressure, input rates, 2    and with a 5-foot exhaust stack installed during the NOx 3    emissions tests.4        (4) Each tested furnace shall be operated in 5    accordance with the procedures specified in Section 3.1 of 6    the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 10, Part 430, 7    Subpart B, Appendix N.8        (5) One of the 2 following formulas shall be used to 9    calculate the NOx emission rate in nanograms of NOx per 10    joule of heat output:11        N=4.566×104PUHCE12        or13        N=3.655×1010P20.9-YZE14        Where:15        N = Calculated mass emissions of NOx per unit of useful 16    heat (nanograms per joule of useful heat delivered to the 17    heated space).18        P = Measured concentration of NOx in flue gas (parts 19    per million by volume).20        Y = Measured concentration of O2 in flue gas 21    (percentage by volume).22        Z = Gross heating value of gas (joules per cubic meter 23    at 0.0 degrees Celsius, 1 atm).24        E = AFUE (percentage), as defined in Section 23-103.25        U = Concentration of CO2 in water-free flue gas for 26    stoichiometric combustion (percentage by volume).  HB3525- 63 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        H = Gross heating value of the fuel (Btu per cubic 2    foot, 60 degrees Fahrenheit, 30-in Hg).3        C = Measured concentration of CO2 in flue gas 4    (percentage by volume). 5    (220 ILCS 5/23-108 new)6    Sec. 23-108. Enforcement and penalties.7    (a) The Director may require the emission test results to 8be provided when deemed necessary to verify compliance and may 9periodically conduct on-site inspections and tests as are 10deemed necessary to ensure compliance. Such verifications 11shall be conducted at least once within 2 years of the date 12described in subsection (a) of Section 23-105 and again at 13least once every 5 years thereafter.14    (b) If the Director determines that a manufacturer, 15distributor, retailer, installer, or other person is in 16violation of any provision of this Act, that violation is 17subject to fines and penalties according to the Director's 18authority.19    (c) For purposes of this Section, fines or penalties may 20be levied against an installer who installs a product covered 21by this Article in violation of this Article, however they 22shall not be levied against such installer's nonmanagerial 23employees, if any, who perform such installation.24    (d) Fines and penalties collected under this Section may 25be used for supplemental environmental programs to offset the   HB3525- 64 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1cost of furnace and water heater replacements in low-income 2and moderate-income households or households in environmental 3justice communities, according to the Director's authority to 4use fines and penalties.5    (e) On or before the date described in subsection (a) of 6Section 23-105, the Director shall establish a process whereby 7individuals may anonymously report potential violations of 8this Act. The Director shall investigate any such reported 9potential violations. 10    (220 ILCS 5/23-109 new)11    Sec. 23-109. Additional regulation. The Director may adopt 12rules as necessary to ensure the proper implementation and 13enforcement of this Article. 14    (220 ILCS 5/23-111 new)15    Sec. 23-111. Revisions to building codes to comply with 16greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirements. 17    (a) Beginning no later than July 1, 2027, to support the 18State's achievement of its greenhouse gas emissions 19requirements and to improve public health outcomes, the State 20building code shall require that the site energy use intensity 21between minimally compliant but otherwise similar buildings of 22differing fuel types shall not be significantly unequal in all 23new construction statewide. Beginning no later than July 1, 242027, to the fullest extent feasible, the building code shall   HB3525- 65 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1require that any area or service within a project where 2infrastructure, building systems, or equipment used for the 3combustion of fossil fuels are installed must be all-electric 4ready.5    (b) Requirements for all-electric ready new construction 6for residential buildings shall include:7        (1) a heat pump space heater ready. Systems using gas 8    or propane furnaces to serve individual dwelling units 9    shall include the following:10            (A) a dedicated 240 volt branch circuit wiring 11        shall be installed within 3 feet from the furnace and 12        accessible to the furnace with no obstructions. The 13        branch circuit conductors shall be rated at 30 amps 14        minimum. The blank cover shall be identified as "240V 15        ready"; and16            (B) the main electrical service panel shall have a 17        reserved space to allow for the installation of a 18        double pole circuit breaker for a future heat pump 19        space heater installation. The reserved space shall be 20        permanently marked as "For Future 240V use";21        (2) an electric cooktop ready. Systems using gas or 22    propane cooktops to serve individual dwelling units shall 23    include the following:24            (A) a dedicated 240 volt branch circuit wiring 25        shall be installed within 3 feet from the cooktop and 26        accessible to the cooktop with no obstructions. The   HB3525- 66 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        branch circuit conductors shall be rated at 50 amps 2        minimum. The blank cover shall be identified as "240V 3        ready"; and4            (B) the main electrical service panel shall have a 5        reserved space to allow for the installation of a 6        double pole circuit breaker for a future electric 7        cooktop installation. The reserved space shall be 8        permanently marked as "For Future 240V Use";9        (3) an electric clothes dryer ready. Clothes dryer 10    locations with gas or propane plumbing shall include the 11    following:12            (A) systems serving individual dwelling units 13        shall include:14                (i) a dedicated 240 volt branch circuit wiring 15            shall be installed within 3 feet from the clothes 16            dryer location and accessible to the clothes dryer 17            location with no obstructions. The branch circuit 18            conductors shall be rated at 30 amps minimum. The 19            blank cover shall be identified as "240V ready"; 20            and21                (ii) the main electrical service panel shall 22            have a reserved space to allow for the 23            installation of a double pole circuit breaker for 24            a future electric clothes dryer installation. The 25            reserved space shall be permanently marked as "For 26            Future 240V Use"; and  HB3525- 67 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1            (B) systems in common use areas shall include 2        conductors or raceway shall be installed with 3        termination points at the main electrical panel, via 4        subpanels if applicable, to a location no more than 3 5        feet from each gas outlet or a designated location of 6        future electric replacement equipment. Both ends of 7        the conductors or raceway shall be labeled "Future 8        240V Use". The conductors or raceway and any 9        intervening subpanels, panelboards, switchboards, and 10        busbars shall be sized to meet the future electric 11        power requirements, at the service voltage to the 12        point at which the conductors serving the building 13        connect to the utility distribution system. The 14        capacity requirements may be adjusted for demand 15        factors. Gas flow rates shall be determined in 16        accordance with State plumbing code. Capacity shall be 17        one of the following:18                (i) 0.24 amps at 208/240 volts per clothes 19            dryer;20                (ii) 2.6 kVA for each 10,000 Btu per hour of 21            rated gas input or gas pipe capacity; or22                (iii) the electrical power required to provide 23            equivalent functionality of the gas-powered 24            equipment as calculated and documented by the 25            responsible person associated with the project; 26            and  HB3525- 68 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        (4) a heat pump water heater ready. Systems using gas 2    or propane service water heaters to serve individual 3    dwelling units shall include the following:4            (A) a dedicated 240 volt branch circuit wiring 5        shall be installed within 3 feet from the furnace and 6        accessible to the furnace with no obstructions. The 7        branch circuit conductors shall be rated at 30 amps 8        minimum. The blank cover shall be identified as "240V 9        ready";10            (B) the main electrical service panel shall have a 11        reserved space to allow for the installation of a 12        double pole circuit breaker for a future heat pump 13        water heater installation. The reserved space shall be 14        permanently marked as "For Future 240V use"; and15            (C) an indoor space that is at least 3 feet by 3 16        feet by 7 feet high shall be available surrounding or 17        within 3 feet of the installed water heater, except 18        where a tankless water heater is installed.19    (c) Newly constructed commercial buildings shall meet the 20requirements of Appendix CH of the 2024 version of the 21International Energy Conservation Code. 22    (d) Beginning no later than January 1, 2028, the State 23building code must include a prescriptive requirement for 24central air conditioning systems that are being removed due to 25equipment failure or as part of a larger renovation project, 26that they must be replaced with a heat pump capable of both   HB3525- 69 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1heating and cooling in accordance with the following 2requirements:3        (1) Requirements for residential buildings: 4            (A) If an existing central air conditioner is 5        removed from a natural gas, propane, or fuel oil 6        forced air system that is to remain in place, the 7        replacement heat pump must be sized to meet the 8        cooling load of the home with controls allowing the 9        heat pump to provide the primary heating and furnace 10        as "backup" heating. 11            (B) If an existing central air conditioner is 12        connected to a natural gas, propane, or fuel oil 13        forced air system that is to also be replaced, the 14        replacement heat pump must be sized to meet all loads 15        of the home. Exceptions may be given for replacement 16        systems that require the main electrical service panel 17        to be upgraded. 18            (C) If an existing central air conditioner and its 19        accompanying ductwork are replaced, the replacement 20        heat pump must be sized to meet all loads of the home. 21        (2) Requirements for commercial buildings: If an 22    existing rooftop packaged unit is removed, the replacement 23    unit must be a heat pump. This requirement only applies to 24    existing rooftop packaged units that are 65,000 Btu/h or 25    less. Exceptions may be given for replacement systems that 26    require the main electrical service panel to be upgraded.    HB3525- 70 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    (220 ILCS 5/23-112 new)2    Sec. 23-112. Revisions to gas service line extensions to 3comply with greenhouse gas emissions reduction requirements.4    (a) To support the State's achievement of its greenhouse 5gas emissions requirements, and to improve public health 6outcomes, no gas company may furnish or supply gas service, 7instrumentalities, and facilities to any commercial or 8residential location that did not receive gas service or did 9not file applications for gas service on or before June 30, 102028.11    (b) The following locations are exempt from the 12requirements of subsection (a):13        (1) buildings that require gas systems for emergency 14    backup power; and15        (2) buildings specifically designated for occupancy by 16    a commercial food establishment, laboratory, laundromat, 17    hospital, or crematorium.  18    (220 ILCS 5/23-301 new)19    Sec. 23-301. Severability. If any provision of this 20Article or the application of this Article to any person or 21circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity does not affect 22other provisions or applications of the Article that can be 23given effect without the invalid provision or application, and 24to this end the provisions of this Article are declared to be   HB3525- 71 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1severable. 2    (220 ILCS 5/Art. XXIV heading new)3ARTICLE XXIV. 2050 HEAT DECARBONIZATION STANDARD 4    (220 ILCS 5/24-101 new)5    Sec. 24-101. Legislative policy. To provide the highest 6quality of life for the residents of this State and to provide 7for a clean and healthy environment, it is the policy of this 8State that natural gas utilities, otherwise referred to as 9"obligated parties", shall transition to 100% zero emissions 10by 2050. Under the heat decarbonization standard, each gas 11utility has an annual obligation, beginning in 2030, to reduce 12the greenhouse gas emissions resulting from the combustion of 13the fuels it delivers to its customers. The emission reduction 14obligation for 2030 shall be 20% relative to each utility's 152020 greenhouse gas emissions levels on a weather-normalized 16basis. The emission reduction obligation shall grow by 4 17percentage points per year every year thereafter, such that 18the annual emission reduction requirement will reach 24% in 192031, 28% in 2032, 32% in 2033, 36% in 2034, 40% by 2035, 44% 20by 2036, 48% by 2037, 52% by 2038, 56% by 2039, 60% by 2040, 2164% by 2041, 68% by 2042, 72% by 2043, 76% by 2044, 80% by 222045, 84% by 2046, 88% by 2047, 92% by 2048, 96% by 2049, and 23100% by 2050. This obligation shall be referred to as the "heat 24decarbonization standard". The heat decarbonization standard   HB3525- 72 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1must be met by the lowest societal cost combination of supply 2and demand-side resources. References in this Article to "this 3Act" means this Article. 4    (220 ILCS 5/24-102 new)5    Sec. 24-102. Options for compliance.6    (a) Obligated parties must demonstrate compliance with the 7heat decarbonization standard using a combination of:8        (1) emission reductions achieved from the obligated 9    parties' own customers; and 10        (2) clean heat credits purchased from other gas 11    utilities that are also obligated parties in this State. 12    (b) Prior to 2035, at least 70% of each obligated party's 13emission reduction obligation must be met through emission 14reductions achieved from its own customers, with no more than 1530% of the emission reduction obligation in any year met 16through the purchase of clean heat credits. From 2035 through 172040, at least 80% of each obligated party's emission 18reduction requirement must be met through emission reductions 19from its own customers, with no more than 20% met through the 20purchase of clean heat credits. After 2040, at least 90% of 21each obligated party's emission reduction requirement must be 22met through emission reductions achieved from its own 23customers, with no more than 10% met through the purchase of 24clean heat credits.    HB3525- 73 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    (220 ILCS 5/24-103 new)2    Sec. 24-103. Measures for customer emission reduction. 3Emissions must be achieved through improvements in customers' 4energy conservation practices, improvements in customers' 5end-use efficiency, full or partial electrification of any end 6use, or switching from fossil methane to lower-emitting liquid 7or gaseous fuels that are delivered by the obligated party and 8directly consumed by end-use customers at the customers' homes 9or businesses. Lower-emitting liquid or gaseous fuels may 10include biomethane, but lower-emitting liquid or gaseous fuels 11may not include hydrogen except for industrial applications. 12For emission reductions from lower-emitting liquid or gaseous 13fuels to be counted toward an obligated party's emission 14reduction obligation, the obligated party must both acquire 15the lower-emitting fuel, including its environmental 16attributes, and demonstrate a contractual pathway for the 17physical delivery of the fuel from the point of injection into 18a pipeline to the obligated party's delivery system. Gas 19utilities may not use reductions in emissions from sources 20unrelated to combustion of fossil gas at customers' homes and 21businesses in this State as emissions offsets or alternatives 22to reductions in the customers' own emissions.23    Obligated parties must meet the heat decarbonization 24standard with the lowest societal cost combination of 25resources, where societal cost includes infrastructure costs, 26utility return on capital, the social cost of greenhouse gas   HB3525- 74 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1emissions and leakage, and the cost of health impacts 2attributable to pollution from a given measure.  3    (220 ILCS 5/24-104 new)4    Sec. 24-104. Demonstrating customer emission reductions.5    (a) Each obligated party's emissions in each year shall be 6calculated as:7        (1) a weather-normalized estimate of emissions from 8    the actual amount of fossil methane consumed by its 9    customers in the year, plus; 10        (2) a weather-normalized estimate of emissions from 11    the leakage of methane, hydrogen, or other greenhouse 12    gases from front or behind-the-meter sources in a given 13    year, plus; 14        (3) a weather-normalized estimate of the magnitude of 15    remaining emissions resulting from switching from fossil 16    methane to lower-emitting liquid or gaseous fuels that are 17    delivered by the obligated party and directly consumed by 18    customers at the customers' homes or businesses in the 19    year. The magnitude of remaining emissions resulting from 20    switching from fossil methane to lower-emitting liquid or 21    gaseous fuels shall be calculated as (i) the magnitude of 22    emissions that would have occurred had fossil methane 23    continued to be consumed, multiplied by (ii) one minus the 24    percent reduction in life cycle emissions resulting from 25    the fuel substitution. Life cycle emission calculations   HB3525- 75 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    shall account for emissions associated with the entire 2    pathway of a fuel, including extraction, production, 3    transportation, distribution, and combustion of the fuel 4    by the consumer. 5    (b) Obligated parties shall calculate these figures 6annually, and electronically submit the figures in an easily 7accessible digital format, such as .PDF, .DOCX, or XLSX, to 8the Environmental Protection Agency, the Commission, the 9Governor, and the General Assembly. 10    (c) The Environmental Protection Agency shall post these 11figures for each utility on a website readily accessible to 12the public, within 30 days of obligated parties submitting the 13figures to the Agency, and shall maintain all previous years' 14records for similar public access. 15    (d) The Environmental Protection Agency shall also assess 16the emissions figures submitted by obligated parties to assess 17those parties' compliance or lack thereof with the heat 18decarbonization standard. If an obligated party does not 19comply, the obligated party shall be subject to enforcement 20mechanisms described in Section 24-108.  21    (220 ILCS 5/24-105 new)22    Sec. 24-105. Tradable clean heat credits. A tradable clean 23heat credit is a tradable, intangible commodity that 24represents an amount of greenhouse gas reduction, measured in 25tons of CO2, achieved by a gas utility from its customers in   HB3525- 76 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1this State. An obligated party must achieve excess emission 2reductions, over and above its annual obligation, to sell 3tradable clean heat credits to another obligated party. The 4number of tradable clean heat credits sold by an obligated 5party in any year may not exceed the magnitude of the obligated 6party's excess emission reductions in that year. 7    (220 ILCS 5/24-106 new)8    Sec. 24-106. Banking of emission reductions. An obligated 9party that achieves emission reductions in a given year that 10are in excess of its emission reduction obligation in that 11year may, in lieu of selling them to another obligated party, 12bank them. Emission reductions that are banked in a given year 13may be used to comply with emission reduction obligations in 14any of the following 3 years. Excess emission reductions may 15not be banked for more than 3 years or used as part of an 16obligated party's annual compliance more than 3 years after 17they were generated. No obligated party may achieve more than 1820% of any annual emission reduction obligation using banked 19emission reductions. 20    (220 ILCS 5/24-107 new)21    Sec. 24-107. Equity in emission reductions. 22    (a) As used in this Section:23    "Equity investment eligible communities" has the meaning 24given to that term in the Energy Transition Act.  HB3525- 77 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    "Income-qualified households" means those households whose 2annual incomes are at or below 80% of the area median income.3    (b) Each obligated party must achieve real emission 4reductions from income-qualified households and environmental 5justice communities that are at least 5 percentage points 6greater than a proportional percentage of the annual gas 7consumption of such customers multiplied by each obligated 8party's annual emissions reduction requirements. At least half 9of the emission reductions from equity investment eligible 10communities shall be from measures that require capital 11investments in homes, have expected lives of at least 10 12years, and are estimated to lower annual energy bills. 13Emission reductions in equity investment eligible communities 14shall include codelivery and coordinated implementation of all 15relevant programs, measures, and complementary services. This 16includes, but is not limited to, pairing high efficiency 17electrification measures and programs with energy efficiency, 18building envelope improvements, the Illinois Solar for All 19Program, energy assistance, health and safety improvements, 20and federal incentives targeted to disadvantaged communities. 21Emission reductions from income-qualified and environmental 22justice communities, including efforts to codeliver and 23coordinate other programs and services, shall be reported on 24at least annually to the Commission. Tradable clean heat 25credits cannot be used to fulfill this requirement.   HB3525- 78 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    (220 ILCS 5/24-108 new)2    Sec. 24-108. Enforcement.3    (a) The Commission shall order an obligated party that 4fails to achieve its emission reduction obligation in a given 5year, including required amounts from income-qualified 6customers and front-line communities, to make a noncompliance 7payment. The noncompliance payment shall be equal to 3 times 8the estimated cost per unit of emission reduction incurred by 9all obligated parties in the State for the emission reductions 10the obligated parties achieved in the prior year.11    (b) The Commission may waive the noncompliance payment if: 12        (1) it finds that the obligated party made a good 13    faith effort to achieve the required amount of emission 14    reduction and its failure to achieve the required 15    reduction resulted from market factors beyond its control, 16    that could not have reasonably been anticipated, and for 17    which the obligated party could not have planned; and 18        (2) it directs the obligated party to add the 19    difference between its obligated level of emission 20    reduction and actual emission reduction achieved to its 21    required emission reduction amount in subsequent years, 22    with the shortfall being made up in no more than 3 years. 23    (c) Payments received pursuant to the noncompliance 24penalty shall be directed to the Commission. 25    (d) The Commission shall use any noncompliance payments to 26contract with an independent third party to achieve emission   HB3525- 79 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1reductions in the service territory of the noncomplying 2utility. The Commission shall prioritize achieving such 3reductions from weatherization or electrification of 4income-qualified households, to the extent that such 5reductions would lower annual energy bills.  6    (220 ILCS 5/24-109 new)7    Sec. 24-109. 2050 Heat Decarbonization Pathways Study.8    (a) In order to ensure sufficient planning for achieving 9this goal, the Commission shall complete a 2050 Heat 10Decarbonization Pathways Study by June 1, 2026, to examine 11feasible and practical pathways for investor-owned natural gas 12utilities to achieve the State's decarbonization requirement 13to be net zero by 2050, and the impacts of decarbonization on 14customers and the electric and natural gas utilities that 15serve the customers.16    (b) The Commission shall host the study in collaboration 17with a technical working group whose members are appointed by 18the Governor and a consultant selected by the technical 19working group. The Commission and technical working group 20shall host a public process for stakeholder input regarding 21(i) the proposed scope of the study, (ii) initial draft 22assumptions for the study, (iii) draft study results, and (iv) 23the draft study report. The technical working group shall 24consist of the following members: 25        (1) one representative of natural gas utilities;   HB3525- 80 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        (2) one representative of electric utilities; 2        (3) the chair of the Commission, or the chair's 3    designee; 4        (4) one representative of the Office of 5    Decarbonization Planning within the Illinois Commerce 6    Commission; 7        (5) one representative of the Environmental Protection 8    Agency; 9        (6) one representative of an environmental advocacy 10    group; 11        (7) one representative of a labor organization; 12        (8) one representative of commercial and industrial 13    gas customers; 14        (9) one representative of an organization that 15    represents residential ratepayer advocates; 16        (10) one representative of a group that represents 17    environmental justice or front-line communities; 18        (11) one representative of a group that represents 19    low-income residents; 20        (12) one representative of an organization that 21    focuses on access to and promotion of energy efficiency; 22    and 23        (13) one climate scientist from a national laboratory 24    or institution of higher education in the State. 25    (c) The 2050 Heat Decarbonization Pathways Study shall 26consider:   HB3525- 81 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        (1) future clean heating strategies for residential, 2    commercial, and industrial customers, including 3    electrification, geothermal heat and thermal networks, and 4    energy efficiency that would comply with each gas 5    utility's obligation under the heat decarbonization 6    standard; 7        (2) a comparative assessment of the marginal 8    greenhouse gas abatement cost curve of resources and 9    technologies, including electrification, that are 10    available for helping the utility meet its heat 11    decarbonization standard requirements; 12        (3) how a reduction in natural gas and other 13    utility-delivered gaseous fuels throughput will impact 14    customer gas and electric rates, considering various price 15    scenarios for electricity, natural gas, and other gaseous 16    fuels and reference medium and high electrification 17    scenarios; 18        (4) strategies to ensure equitable prioritization of 19    decarbonization measures and programs in income-qualified 20    and environmental justice communities while minimizing 21    energy transition costs on ratepayers, with an emphasis on 22    an accessible and affordable transition for low-income 23    residents, fixed-income residents, and residents within 24    equity investment eligible communities; 25        (5) an assessment of demand-side resource potential, 26    including load management, energy efficiency,   HB3525- 82 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    conservation, demand response, and fuel switching, 2    including electrification, available federal, State, 3    county, local, and private incentives, or financing 4    options related to building electrification and 5    efficiency;6        (6) that the federal incentives analysis must include 7    ways that investor-owned utilities can leverage rebates 8    and tax incentives in the Inflation Reduction Act and 9    Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act; in addition, the 10    assessment must include ways for the investor-owned 11    utilities to maximize low-income qualified households' 12    participation in the electrification incentive programs; 13        (7) the impacts of building and vehicle 14    electrification on the electric grid and strategies to 15    integrate gas and electric system planning and resource 16    optimization; 17        (8) specific natural gas end uses that may be suitable 18    for the use of alternative fuels, such as biomethane and 19    green hydrogen, and an assessment of the natural gas end 20    uses' commercial availability, social cost, and life cycle 21    emissions; 22        (9) a comparative evaluation of the cost of natural 23    gas purchasing strategies, storage options, delivery 24    resources, and improvements in demand-side resources using 25    a consistent method to calculate cost-effectiveness; and 26        (10) an evaluation of employment metrics associated   HB3525- 83 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    with each alternative, including a projection of gas 2    distribution jobs affected by a given alternative and jobs 3    made available through the alternative, a description of 4    opportunities to transition any affected gas distribution 5    jobs to the alternative, and an explanation of how 6    employment impacts associated with each alternative could 7    affect equity investment eligible communities. Given its 8    findings, the study will create a Just Transition Plan, 9    inclusive of funding needs, for the current gas workforce. 10    (d) The Chair of the Commission, or the Chair's designee, 11will also serve as the Chair of the Technical Working Group.  12    (220 ILCS 5/24-110 new)13    Sec. 24-110. Gas infrastructure planning.14    (a) This Article creates the Office of Decarbonization 15Planning within the Commission to manage an iterative 16statewide heat decarbonization plan located within the 17Commission. On a timeline concurrent with the 2050 Heat 18Decarbonization Pathways Study, the Office of Decarbonization 19Planning shall adopt rules for implementing the heat 20decarbonization plans.21    (b) As used in this Section:22    "Environmental justice communities" has the meaning given 23to that term in the Illinois Power Agency Act. 24    "Lowest reasonable cost" means the least-cost, least-risk 25mix of demand-side, supply-side, and electrification resources   HB3525- 84 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1determined through a detailed and consistent analysis of a 2wide range of commercially available sources. At a minimum, 3this analysis must consider resource costs, resource 4availability, market-volatility risks, the risks imposed on 5ratepayers, resource effect on system operations, public 6policies regarding resource preferences, the cost of risks 7associated with environmental effects, including emissions of 8carbon dioxide, the ability to scale to meet 2050 goals, air 9pollution and resulting public health impacts, equity impacts, 10and the need for security of supply.11    "Planned project" means any programmatic expense or 12related group of programmatic expenses with a defined scope of 13work and associated cost estimate that exceeds $1,000,000 in 142020 dollars or $500,000 in 2020 dollars for gas utilities 15with less than 50,000 full service customers, as adjusted 16annually for inflation.17    "Resources" means both demand-side and supply-side 18resources, including, but not limited to, natural gas, 19biomethane, green hydrogen for industrial application, 20conservation, energy efficiency, demand response, and 21electrification.22    (c) Each natural gas utility regulated by the Commission 23has the responsibility to meet system demand and public policy 24requirements, including the State's heat decarbonization 25standard, with the lowest reasonable cost and most feasible 26mix of resources. In furtherance of that responsibility, each   HB3525- 85 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1natural gas utility must develop a gas infrastructure plan for 2meeting the utility's heat decarbonization standard, including 35-year interim milestones from 2025 until 2050. The gas 4infrastructure plan must take into account the findings of the 52050 Heat Decarbonization Pathways Study. 6    (d) Natural gas utilities shall file biennial gas 7infrastructure plans that create alignment between gas utility 8distribution system investments and the utility's heat 9decarbonization standard obligations at lowest reasonable cost 10and that consider nonpipeline infrastructure projects that 11minimize costs over the long term. 12    (e) Before the filing of each biennial gas infrastructure 13plan, the Office of Decarbonization Planning shall contract 14for gas demand forecasts for each regulated gas utility in the 15State from an independent party. Gas utilities must reasonably 16provide accurate and timely system data to the independent 17contractor selected to conduct the forecasts. For each 18regulated gas utility in the State, the third party must 19produce forecasts for each customer class that consider slow, 20medium, and rapid acceleration of residential, commercial, and 21industrial electrification of the end uses that rely upon the 22direct combustion of natural gas in buildings. The forecasts 23must include, to the extent possible, the effects of updated 24State and local building codes, changes to the number of gas 25utility customers, consumer responses to building 26electrification programs or incentives offered within a gas   HB3525- 86 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1utility's service territory, the price elasticity of gas 2demand if rates increase due to reduced gas throughput and the 3impacts of commodity prices, and any other criteria as 4stipulated by the Commission. The forecasts shall be due to 5the Commission and the gas utilities at least 8 months prior to 6the filing of a gas infrastructure plan. 7    (f) A gas infrastructure plan must: 8        (1) cover the 20 years immediately following the 9    approval of the plan with a 5-year action plan of 10    investments; 11        (2) provide the estimated total cost and annual 12    incremental revenue requirements of the proposed action 13    plan, assuming both conventional depreciation and 14    accelerated depreciation, as applicable; 15        (3) use the various gas demand forecasts provided to 16    it under this article and include a range of possible 17    future scenarios and input sensitivities for the purpose 18    of testing the robustness of the utility's portfolio of 19    planned projects under various parameters; 20        (4) take into account the findings of the 2050 Heat 21    Decarbonization Pathways Study; 22        (5) demonstrate that the utility's infrastructure 23    investment plans align with obligations under the heat 24    decarbonization standard; 25        (6) include a list of all proposed system expenditures 26    and investments, including an analysis of infrastructure   HB3525- 87 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    needs and detailed information on all planned projects 2    within the action plan; 3        (7) include the results of nonpipeline alternative 4    analyses conducted for all planned projects not necessary 5    to mitigate a near-term safety or reliability risk subject 6    to rules by the Commission that include, but are not 7    limited to: 8            (A) a consideration of both supply and demand-side 9        alternatives to traditional capital investments, 10        including gas demand response and electrification; and 11            (B) a cost-benefit analysis of the various options 12        that consider non-energy benefits and the societal 13        value, including health benefits, of reduced carbon 14        emissions and surface-level pollutants, particularly 15        in equity investment eligible communities; 16        (8) minimize rate impacts on customers, particularly 17    low-income households and households within equity 18    investment eligible communities; 19        (9) describe the methodology, criteria, and 20    assumptions used to develop the plan; 21        (10) include one or more system maps indicating 22    locations of individual planned projects, pressure 23    districts served by the individual project, locations of 24    equity investment eligible communities, and any other 25    information as required by the Commission; 26        (11) provide a summary of stakeholder participation   HB3525- 88 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    and input from a public stakeholder process, and an 2    explanation of how input was incorporated into the plan, 3    including for all projects located within equity 4    investment eligible communities, a description of its 5    outreach to members of that community and findings from 6    those efforts; and 7        (12) requires the utility, to the extent that the 8    utility assumes the use of alternative fuels, such as 9    biomethane or green hydrogen, to meet its obligations 10    under the heat decarbonization standard, to demonstrate a 11    plan to procure firm supply and cost-effectiveness as 12    compared to nonfuel alternatives, inclusive of the costs 13    to retrofit all public and private infrastructure to 14    accommodate the fuels; green hydrogen may only be used for 15    industrial applications; hydrogen blending with methane 16    shall not be part of decarbonization plans. 17    (g) Not later than 12 months before the due date of a plan, 18the utility must provide a work plan for the Commission to 19review. The work plan must outline the content of the resource 20plan to be developed by the utility, the method for assessing 21potential resources, and the timing and extent of public 22participation. In addition, the Commission will hear comments 23on the plan at a minimum of 3 public hearings, held at times 24and locations accessible and convenient to most people, 25including at least one in an equity investment eligible 26community, which are scheduled after the utility submits its   HB3525- 89 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1plan for Commission review. 2    (h) No later than July 1, 2027, gas utilities in this State 3must file the first gas infrastructure plan application for 4approval. The Commission may approve, deny, or require 5modifications to the plan. Once approved, the plan must be 6incorporated into the utility's next general rate case using 7the approved ratemaking treatments. Deviations based on 8unforeseen circumstances must be justified and approved by the 9Commission. 10    (i) The Commission shall adopt new rules, amend existing 11rules, as necessary, and dedicate sufficient resources to 12implement this Section.  13    (220 ILCS 5/24-111 new)14    Sec. 24-111. Study on gas utility financial incentive 15reform.16    (a) The General Assembly finds that:17        (1) Improving the alignment of gas utility customer 18    interests, State policy, and company interests is critical 19    to ensuring the expected decline in the use of natural gas 20    is done efficiently, safely, cost-effectively, and 21    transparently.22        (2) There is urgency around addressing increasing 23    threats from climate change and assisting communities that 24    have borne disproportionate impacts from climate change, 25    including air pollution, greenhouse gas emissions, and   HB3525- 90 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    energy burdens. Addressing this problem requires changes 2    to the energy used to power homes and businesses, and 3    changes to the gas utility business model under which 4    utilities in the State have traditionally functioned.5        (3) Gas utility ratepayers may face upwardly spiraling 6    bills if steps are not taken to contain costs and 7    strategically prune parts of the gas distribution network.8        (4) There is a need to encourage gas utilities to 9    innovate and find new lines of business to maintain 10    financial health as their main business, the provision of 11    fossil natural gas, winds down.12        (5) The current regulatory framework has encouraged 13    infrastructure programs that have been plagued by 14    excessive cost overruns and delays.15        (6) Discussions of performance incentive mechanisms 16    must always take into account the affordability of 17    customer rates and bills via stakeholder input.18    The General Assembly, therefore, directs the Commission to 19reform the gas utility financial incentives structure to 20further specified goals and objectives related to the 21provision of clean, affordable heat and the advancement of an 22equitable distribution of benefits and reduction in harms in 23equity investment eligible communities and economically 24disadvantaged communities.25    (b) The Commission shall open an investigation to consider 26performance-based ratemaking tools and other financial   HB3525- 91 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1mechanisms to advance the goals of affordability, equity, 2pollution reduction, energy system flexibility and 3electrification, reliability, safety, customer experience, 4cost-effectiveness, and the financial health of gas utilities 5as the gas utilities scale down their core business of 6delivering fuel-based energy through the distribution network. 7The investigation shall consider the following mechanisms, in 8addition to any others that the Commission or stakeholders 9deem necessary:10        (1) accelerated and shortened depreciation schedules;11        (2) performance metrics and benchmarking;12        (3) revenue decoupling;13        (4) cost-recovery options for nonpipeline 14    alternatives;15        (5) electrification;16        (6) networked geothermal systems;17        (7) securitization;18        (8) fuel-cost sharing;19        (9) multiyear rate plans;20        (10) performance incentive mechanisms;21        (11) the equalization of capital and operational 22    expenditures;23        (12) return on equity levels for different investment 24    types;25        (13) rate designs at the electric and gas nexus;26        (14) low-income rates;  HB3525- 92 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1        (15) luxury gas rates; and2        (16) intersectoral cost recovery.3    (c) The Commission must create a framework to evaluate 4each mechanism on its own and as part of a set of mechanisms to 5achieve the policy objectives determined by the General 6Assembly, stakeholders, and the general public after a minimum 7of 3 public hearings held at times and locations accessible 8and convenient to most people, including at least one in an 9equity investment eligible community.10    (d) The investigation shall consist of a series of 11workshops facilitated by an independent consultant that 12encourages representation from diverse stakeholders, ensures 13equitable opportunities for participation, and does not 14require formal intervention or representation by an attorney.15    (e) Any recommendations at the conclusion of the process 16must be shared with the General Assembly, and those 17recommendations already within the Commission's existing 18authorities must be adopted in the next applicable general 19rate case or relevant filing. 20    (220 ILCS 5/24-112 new)21    Sec. 24-112. Reporting requirements.22    (a) Each gas utility in the State must report data to the 23Commission in January and July of each year that satisfy 24metrics that are set by the Commission to assess, on a system, 25segment, and neighborhood basis, the level of system safety   HB3525- 93 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1and risk. The metrics must include, but are not limited to, the 2following:3        (1) the overall average leak rate of replaced and 4    to-be-replaced mains and leak-prone pipes;5        (2) the overall average leak rate using only 6    leak-prone pipe and current leaks;7        (3) the neighborhood average leak rate using only 8    remaining leak-prone pipes and current leaks; and9        (4) the neighborhood historic average leak rate using 10    leaks on leak-prone pipes for the past 2 years, on a 11    rolling basis, normalized for weather, and incorporating 12    all class 2 leaks except third-party damage.13    (b) Gas utilities must include in the report an assessment 14of whether the actions taken in the prior 3 years produced the 15best value, in terms of risk reduction, for the amounts 16expended and a prediction of how planned projects will change 17risk levels on a neighborhood, segment, and system basis. The 18report filed by Peoples Gas Light and Coke Company must also 19include updates on steps taken to implement the 20recommendations of the Final Report on Phase One of an 21Investigation of Peoples Gas Light and Coke Company's AMRP. 22The Commission may require any other gas utility to adopt new 23and revised practices and processes by Peoples Gas Light and 24Coke Company to ensure consistency across utilities.25    (c) In its review of the data and metrics provided, the 26Commission may order adjustments in infrastructure replacement   HB3525- 94 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1plans as it deems necessary to meet an acceptable level of risk 2at appropriate cost. 3    (220 ILCS 5/Art. XXV heading new)4ARTICLE XXV. STATE NAVIGATOR PROGRAM LAW 5    (220 ILCS 5/25-101 new)6    Sec. 25-101. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 7State Navigator Program Law. References in this Article to 8"this Act" mean this Article. 9    (220 ILCS 5/25-102 new)10    Sec. 25-102. Intent. The General Assembly finds that 11improving the energy efficiency of, and reducing the 12greenhouse gases from, residential buildings are critical to 13meeting the State's adopted climate goals in Public Act 14102-662.15    The General Assembly recognizes that making information 16about energy efficiency and weatherization programs, 17electrification services, skilled contractors, and federal and 18State electrification incentives available to State residents 19will assist obligated parties to comply with the Clean Heat 20Standard set out in Article XXIII. Further, the General 21Assembly recognizes that establishing a comprehensive 22statewide navigator program is essential to ensuring equitable 23access to electrification and energy efficient services. This   HB3525- 95 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1program requires the Administrator to help State residents 2combine local, State, federal, and utility services related to 3electrification, energy efficiency, and the reduction of 4energy burdens to maximize electrification and energy 5efficiency in this State, and fill gaps as needed. 6    (220 ILCS 5/25-103 new)7    Sec. 25-103. Definitions. As used in this Article:8    "Administrator" means an entity, including, but not 9limited to, a nonprofit corporation or community-based 10organization. "Administrator" does not include an energy 11utility.12    "Customers" means residents, businesses, and building 13owners.14    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 15Opportunity.16    "Electrification services" includes energy audits, 17assistance converting to on-site renewable energy, installing 18electric heat pumps and heat pump water heaters, electric 19appliance replacement, assistance with paperwork, arranging 20for financing, energy efficiency, weatherization, health and 21safety, and any related services and work.22    "Equity investment eligible communities" has the meaning 23given to that term in Section 5-5 of the Energy Transition Act.24    "Income-qualified households" means those whose annual 25incomes are at or below 80% of area median income.  HB3525- 96 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    "Navigator Working Group" means representatives appointed 2by the Department who represent members from either the 3electrician trades, construction industry, community 4organizations that work in energy burdened communities, 5community organizations who have experience with 6weatherization programs, members from equity investment 7eligible communities or the Illinois Commerce Commission or 8staff, and electric utilities and obligated parties as 9indicated in Article XXIII. 10    (220 ILCS 5/25-104 new)11    Sec. 25-104. Creation of State navigator program.12    (a) The Department may establish and oversee a statewide 13building energy upgrade navigator program. The purpose of the 14navigator program is to provide a statewide resource to assist 15building owners and building renters with accessing 16electrification services and energy efficiency services and 17programs, funding, and any other assistance that will result 18in aiding obligated parties' compliance with the Clean Heat 19Standard in Article XXIII. This includes, but is not limited 20to, utility programs, the weatherization assistance program, 21federal funding, rebates, health and safety funding, and other 22State and local funding.23    (b) The Department must coordinate and collaborate with 24the navigator working group on the design, administration, and 25implementation of the navigator program.  HB3525- 97 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    (c) The Department must ensure that all State residents 2have equitable access to the navigator program.3    (d) The Department may consult with other programs, 4entities, and stakeholders as the Department determines to be 5appropriate on the design, administration, and implementation 6of the navigator program.7    (e) Third-Party Administrator.8        (1) The Department may contract out this program to 9    the Administrator. Subject to the following requirements:10            (A) The Administrator must be selected through a 11        competitive process.12            (B) The Administrator must have experience with 13        running statewide programs related to energy 14        efficiency, electrification services, or 15        weatherization programs.16            (C) The Administrator must have experience working 17        with multifamily building owners and renters.18            (D) The Administrator must have experience 19        assisting people with low incomes or energy burdened 20        households.21            (E) The Administrator must have experience running 22        programs in both urban and rural parts of the State, 23        including covering a range of geographic and community 24        diversity.25        (2) If the Department decides to hire an 26    Administrator, they must enter into a contract within a   HB3525- 98 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    year of the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 2    104th General Assembly.3        (3) If the Department decides to hire an 4    Administrator, the contract expires after 4 years. After 4 5    years, the Department can renew the contract or select a 6    different Administrator. If the Administrator is not 7    meeting the requirements of the program and its 8    participants, the contract may be terminated early, and a 9    new Administrator may be hired.10        (4) The Administrator shall have the same 11    responsibilities as the Department in creating, 12    overseeing, and implementing the programs in the navigator 13    program.14    (f) The Department or Administrator of the navigator 15program must:16        (1) provide outreach and deliver energy services to:17            (A) owner occupied and rental residences; and18            (B) single-family and multifamily dwellings;19        (2) provide coverage for all geographic regions in the 20    State;21        (3) support energy efficient and emissions reductions 22    alternatives for all types of fuel used in buildings; the 23    Department or Administrator shall ensure funding is used 24    for projects that include electrification and energy 25    efficiency work, and any related health and safety, 26    renewable energy, and whole building needs; funding shall   HB3525- 99 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    not be used for the installation of new natural gas or 2    other fossil fuel equipment;3        (4) create strategies to ensure that the navigator 4    program prioritizes services in equity investment eligible 5    communities, one of which must include dedicating at least 6    40% of the total funding for the navigator program to 7    deploy electrification services, energy efficiency 8    measures, renewable energy, health and safety upgrades, 9    and related upgrades in equity investment eligible 10    communities, through;11            (A) weatherization services, including air sealing 12        and insulation;13            (B) health and safety improvements;14            (C) purchase and installation of efficient 15        electric equipment;16            (D) energy efficiency improvements, as needed;17            (E) health and safety improvements that aid in 18        energy conservation;19            (F) weatherization services;20            (G) solar, storage, and renewable energy, as 21        needed; and22            (G) workforce development programs;23        (5) create a strategy for how the navigator program 24    will equitably assist residents in accessing rebates and 25    incentives in the federal Inflation Reduction Act;26        (6) create a strategy for how the navigator program   HB3525- 100 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    will assist customers in accessing State funding 2    opportunities available to access electrification 3    services;4        (7) create a strategy to stack funding from all 5    available incentives and tax rebates together with the 6    goal of creating a 'one-stop shop' for all weatherization, 7    energy efficiency and electrification services;8        (8) support the integrated implementation of all 9    relevant clean building programs funded in the State 10    budget, including, but not limited to:11            (A) the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program; 12        and13            (B) the Illinois Home Weatherization Assistance 14        Program; and15        (9) maintain a recommended contractor list. 16    (220 ILCS 5/25-105 new)17    Sec. 25-105. Education materials and outreach. The 18Department or Administrator shall:19        (1) create educational materials, which must include 20    information about all relevant funds and financial 21    assistance available from federal, State, local, and 22    energy utility programs, including, but not limited to, 23    incentives, rebates, tax credits, grants, and loan 24    programs;25        (2) contract with one or more community-based   HB3525- 101 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    organizations that demonstrate past success in working 2    with equity investment eligible communities in order to 3    create and distribute educational materials specifically 4    targeted at equity investment eligible communities;5        (3) support and connect community-based organizations 6    in their region to training programs in areas of 7    electrification, energy efficiency, building envelope, and 8    installation technical assistance, and other relevant 9    areas; and10        (4) ensure the education and outreach work is 11    coordinated with other State energy efficiency, 12    weatherization, electrification, and related programs and 13    providers. 14    (220 ILCS 5/25-106 new)15    Sec. 25-106. Delivered services for equity investment 16eligible communities.17    (a) The Department or Administrator must implement the 18navigator program for income-qualified households, which must 19include support navigating to existing programs or directly 20providing and filling gaps related to:21        (1) energy audits to provide recommendations to 22    customers on a wide range of cost-effective energy and 23    health improvements;24        (2) weatherization and energy efficiency services, 25    including, but not limited to,     adding insulation, sealing   HB3525- 102 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    cracks, and making other changes that reduce heat loss, 2    save money on heating bills, and improve the health and 3    safety of buildings;4        (3) appliance upgrades;5        (4) electrification services, including installation 6    of air-sourced heat pumps, heat pump hot water heaters, 7    cooling, and electric panel upgrades and wiring;8        (5) accessing qualified energy contractors; and9        (6) securing financing.10    (b) Nothing in this Section shall preclude the 11implementation of measures that, in addition to producing 12energy savings, increase electric load by adding building 13cooling systems where none existed before. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.  HB3525- 103 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 730/5-254    220 ILCS 5/1-102from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 1-1025    220 ILCS 5/1-103 new6    220 ILCS 5/3-128 new7    220 ILCS 5/8-101from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 8-1018    220 ILCS 5/8-104B new9    220 ILCS 5/9-228.5 new10    220 ILCS 5/9-22911    220 ILCS 5/9-235 new12    220 ILCS 5/9-241from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 9-24113    220 ILCS 5/9-254 new14    220 ILCS 5/9-255 new15    220 ILCS 5/16-111.1016    220 ILCS 5/Art. XXIII 17    heading new18    220 ILCS 5/23-101 new19    220 ILCS 5/23-102 new20    220 ILCS 5/23-103 new21    220 ILCS 5/23-104 new22    220 ILCS 5/23-105 new23    220 ILCS 5/23-106 new24    220 ILCS 5/23-107 new25    220 ILCS 5/23-108 new  HB3525- 104 -LRB104 10206 AAS 20280 b1    220 ILCS 5/23-109 new2    220 ILCS 5/23-111 new3    220 ILCS 5/23-112 new4    220 ILCS 5/23-301 new5    220 ILCS 5/Art. XXIV 6    heading new7    220 ILCS 5/24-101 new8    220 ILCS 5/24-102 new9    220 ILCS 5/24-103 new10    220 ILCS 5/24-104 new11    220 ILCS 5/24-105 new12    220 ILCS 5/24-106 new13    220 ILCS 5/24-107 new14    220 ILCS 5/24-108 new15    220 ILCS 5/24-109 new16    220 ILCS 5/24-110 new17    220 ILCS 5/24-111 new18    220 ILCS 5/24-112 new19    220 ILCS 5/Art. XXV 20    heading new21    220 ILCS 5/25-101 new22    220 ILCS 5/25-102 new23    220 ILCS 5/25-103 new24    220 ILCS 5/25-104 new25    220 ILCS 5/25-105 new26    220 ILCS 5/25-106 new